;; -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
(("IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence" "The IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence (PAMI) is published monthly. Its Editorial Board strives to publish papers that present important research results within PAMI's scope. These include statistical and structural pattern recognition; image analysis; computational models of vision; computer vision systems; enhancement, restoration, segmentation, feature extraction, shape and texture analysis; applications of pattern analysis in medicine, industry, government, and the arts and sciences; artificial intelligence, knowledge representation, logical and probabilistic inference, learning, speech recognition, character and text recognition, syntactic and semantic processing, understanding natural language, expert systems, and specialized architectures for such processing." "http://www.computer.org/tpami" (20681 64083 859856) feed 0 nil nil ((title nil "IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence") (link nil "http://www.computer.org/tpami") (description nil "The IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence (PAMI) is published monthly. Its Editorial Board strives to publish papers that present important research results within PAMI's scope. These include statistical and structural pattern recognition; image analysis; computational models of vision; computer vision systems; enhancement, restoration, segmentation, feature extraction, shape and texture analysis; applications of pattern analysis in medicine, industry, government, and the arts and sciences; artificial intelligence, knowledge representation, logical and probabilistic inference, learning, speech recognition, character and text recognition, syntactic and semantic processing, understanding natural language, expert systems, and specialized architectures for such processing.	") (language nil "en-us") (pubDate nil "Thu, 13 Dec 2012 11:00:06 GMT") (image nil (url nil "http://csdl.computer.org/common/images/logos/tpami.gif") (title nil "IEEE Computer Society") (description nil "List of recently published journal articles") (link nil "http://www.computer.org/tpami")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Calibration of Smooth Camera Models") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.258") (description nil "Generic imaging models can be used to represent any camera. Current generic models are discrete and define a mapping between each pixel in the image and a straight line in 3D space. This paper presents a modification of the generic camera model that allows the simplification of the calibration procedure. The only requirement is that the coordinates of the 3D projecting lines are related by functions that vary smoothly across space. Such model is obtained by modifying the general imaging model using radial basis functions to interpolate image coordinates and 3D lines, thereby allowing both an increase in resolution (due to their continuous nature) and a more compact representation. Using this variation of the general imaging model we also develop a calibration procedure. This procedure only requires that a 3D point be matched to each pixel. In addition not all the pixels need to be calibrated. As a result the complexity of the procedure is significantly decreased. Normalization is applied to the coordinates of both image and 3D points which increases the accuracy of the calibration. Results with both synthetic and real data sets show that the model and calibration procedure are easily applicable and provide accurate calibration results.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.258")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Clustering Dynamic Textures with the Hierarchical EM Algorithm for Modeling Video") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.236") (description nil "The dynamic texture (DT) is a probabilistic generative model, defined over space and time, that represents a video as the output of a linear dynamical system (LDS). The DT model has been applied to a wide variety of computer vision problems, such as motion segmentation, motion classification, and video registration. In this paper, we derive a new algorithm for clustering DT models that is based on the hierarchical EM algorithm. The proposed clustering algorithm is capable of both clustering DTs and learning novel DT cluster centers that are representative of the cluster members, in a manner that is consistent with the underlying generative probabilistic model of the DT. We also derive an efficient recursive algorithm for sensitivity analysis of the discrete-time Kalman smoothing filter, which is used as the basis for computing expectations in the E-step of the HEM algorithm. Finally, we demonstrate the efficacy of the clustering algorithm on several applications in motion analysis, including hierarchical motion clustering, semantic motion annotation, and learning bag-of-systems codebooks for dynamic texture recognition.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.236")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Image-Based Separation of Reflective and Fluorescent Components using Illumination Variant and Invariant Color") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.255") (description nil "Traditionally researchers tend to exclude fluorescence from color appearance algorithms in computer vision and image processing because of its complexity. In reality, fluorescence is a very common phenomenon observed in many objects, from gems and corals, to different kinds of writing paper, and to our clothes. In this paper, we provide detailed theories of fluorescence phenomenon. In particular, we show that the color appearance of fluorescence is unaffected by illumination in which it differs from ordinary reflectance. Moreover, we show that the color appearance of objects with reflective and fluorescent components can be represented as a linear combination of the two components. A linear model allows us to separate the two components using images taken under unknown illuminants using independent component analysis(ICA). The effectiveness of the proposed method is demonstrated using digital images of various fluorescent objects.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.255")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Keeping a Pan-Tilt-Zoom Camera Calibrated") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.250") (description nil "Pan-tilt-zoom (PTZ) cameras are pervasive in modern surveillance systems. However, we demonstrate that the (pan, tilt) coordinates reported by PTZ cameras become inaccurate after many hours of operation, endangering tracking and 3D localization algorithms that rely on the accuracy of such values. To solve this problem, we propose a complete model for a pan-tilt-zoom camera that explicitly reflects how focal length and lens distortion vary as a function of zoom scale. We show how the parameters of this model can be quickly and accurately estimated using a series of simple initialization steps followed by a nonlinear optimization. Our method requires only ten images to achieve accurate calibration results. Next, we show how the calibration parameters can be maintained using a one-shot dynamic correction process; this ensures that the camera returns the same field of view every time the user requests a given (pan, tilt, zoom), even after hundreds of hours of operation. The dynamic calibration algorithm is based on matching the current image against a stored feature library created at the time the PTZ camera is mounted. We evaluate the calibration and dynamic correction algorithms on both experimental and real-world datasets, demonstrating the effectiveness of the techniques.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.250")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Unified Detection and Tracking of Instruments During Retinal Microsurgery") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.209") (description nil "Methods for tracking an object have generally fallen into two groups: tracking by detection, and tracking through local optimization. The advantage of detection-based tracking is its ability to deal with target appearance and disappearance, but does not naturally take advantage of target motion continuity during detection. The advantage of local optimization is efficiency and accuracy, but requires additional algorithms to initialize tracking when the target is lost. To bridge these two approaches, we propose a framework for unified detection and tracking as a time-series Bayesian estimation problem. The basis of our approach is to treat both detection and tracking as a sequential entropy minimization problem, where the goal is to determine the parameters describing a target in each frame. To do this we integrate the Active Testing paradigm with Bayesian filtering, and this results in a framework capable of both detecting and tracking robustly in situations where the target object enters and leaves the field of view regularly. We demonstrate our approach on a retinal tool tracking problem and show through extensive experiments that our method provides an efficient and robust tracking solution.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.209")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Discovering Low-Rank Shared Concept Space for Adapting Text Mining Models") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.243") (description nil "We propose a framework for adapting text mining models that discovers low-rank shared concept space. Our major characteristic of this concept space is that it explicitly minimizes the distribution gap between the source domain with sufficient labeled data and the target domain with only unlabeled data, while at the same time it minimizes the empirical loss on the labeled data in the source domain. Our method is capable of conducting the domain adaptation task both in the original feature space as well as in the transformed Reproducing Kernel Hilbert Space (RKHS) using kernel tricks. Theoretical analysis guarantees that the error of our adaptation model can be bounded with respect to the embedded distribution gap and the empirical loss in the source domain. We have conducted extensive experiments on two common text mining problems, namely, document classification and information extraction to demonstrate the efficacy of our proposed framework.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.243")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Monocular SLAM with Conditionally Independent Split Mapping") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.234") (description nil "The recovery of structure from motion in real time over extended areas demands methods that mitigate the effects of computational complexity and arithmetical inconsistency. In this paper we develop SCISM, an algorithm based on relative frame bundle adjustment, which splits the recovered map of 3D landmarks and keyframes poses so that the camera can continue to grow and explore a local map in real-time while, at the same time, a bulk map is optimized in the background. By temporarily excluding certain measurements it ensures that both maps are consistent, and by using the relative frame representation new results from the bulk process can update the local process without disturbance. The paper first shows how to apply this representation to the parallel tracking and mapping (PTAM) method, a real-time bundle adjuster, and compares results obtained using global and relative frames. It then explains the relative representation's use in SCISM and describes an implementation using PTAM. The paper provides evidence of the algorithm's real-time operation in outdoor scenes, and includes comparison with a more conventional submapping approach.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.234")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: A Game-Theoretic Approach to Hypergraph Clustering") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.226") (description nil "Hypergraph clustering refers to the process of extracting maximally coherent groups from a set of objects using high-order (rather than pairwise) similarities. Traditional approaches to this problem are based on the idea of partitioning the input data into a predetermined number of classes, thereby obtaining the clusters as a by-product of the partitioning process. In this paper, we offer a radically different view of the problem. In contrast to the classical approach, we attempt to provide a meaningful formalization of the very notion of a cluster and we show that game theory offers an attractive and unexplored perspective that serves well our purpose. To this end, we formulate the hypergraph clustering problem in terms of a non-cooperative multi-player \"clustering game,\" and show that a natural notion of a cluster turns out to be equivalent to a classical (evolutionary) game-theoretic equilibrium concept. We prove that the problem of finding the equilibria of our clustering game is equivalent to locally optimizing a polynomial function over the standard simplex, and we provide a discrete-time high-order replicator dynamics to perform this optimization, based on the Baum-Eagon inequality. Experiments over synthetic as well as real-world data are presented which show the superiority of our approach over the state of the art.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.226")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Robust Extrema Features for Time-Series Data Analysis") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.216") (description nil "The extraction of robust features for comparing and analyzing time-series is a fundamentally important problem. Research efforts in this area encompass dimensionality reduction using popular signal analysis tools such as the discrete Fourier and wavelet transforms, various distance metrics, and the extraction of interest points from time-series. Recently, extrema features for analysis of time-series data have assumed increasing significance because of their natural robustness under a variety of practical distortions, their economy of representation and computational benefits. Invariably, the process of encoding extrema features is preceded by filtering of the time-series with an intuitively motivated filter, and subsequent thresholding to identify robust extrema. We define the properties of robustness, uniqueness and cardinality as a means to identify the design choices available in each step of the feature generation process. Unlike existing methods which utilize filters \"inspired\" from either domain knowledge or intuition, we explicitly optimize the filter based on training time-series to optimize robustness of the extracted extrema features. We demonstrate further that the underlying filter optimization problem reduces to an eigenvalue problem and has a tractable solution. An encoding technique that enhances the control over cardinality and uniqueness is also presented. Experimental results obtained for the problem of time series subsequence matching establish the merits of the proposed algorithm.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.216")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Numerical Conditioning Problems and Solutions for Nonparametric i.i.d. Statistical Active Contours") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.207") (description nil "In this paper, we propose an active contour model based on non-parametric independent and identically distributed (i.i.d.) statistics of the image that can segment an image without any apriori information about the intensity distributions of the region of interest or the background. This is not, however, the first active contour model proposed to solve the segmentation problem under these same assumptions. In contrast to prior active contour models based on nonparametric i.i.d. statistics, we do not formulate our optimization criterion according to any distance measure between estimated probability densities inside and outside the active contour. Instead, treating the segmentation problem as a pixel-wise classification problem, we formulate an active contour to minimize the unbiased pixel-wise Average Misclassification Probability (AMP). This not only simplifies the problem by avoiding the need to arbitrarily select among many sensible distance measures to measure the difference between the probability densities estimated inside and outside the active contour, but it also solves a numerical conditioning problem that arises with such prior active contour models. As a result, the AMP model exhibits faster convergence with higher accuracy and robustness when compared to active contour models previously formulated to solve the same non-parametric i.i.d. statistical segmentation problem via probability distances.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.207")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Local Evidence Aggregation for Regression Based Facial Point Detection") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.205") (description nil "We propose a new algorithm to detect facial points in frontal and near-frontal face images. It combines a regression-based approach with a probabilistic graphical model-based face shape model, that restricts the search to anthropomorphically consistent regions. While most regression-based approaches perform a sequential approximation of the target location, our algorithm detects the target location by aggregating the estimates obtained from stochastically selected local appearance information into a single robust prediction. The underlying assumption is that by aggregating the different estimates, their errors will cancel out as long as the regressor inputs are uncorrelated. Once this new perspective is adopted, the problem is reformulated as how to optimally select the test locations over which the regressors are evaluated. We propose to extend the regression-based model to provide a quality measure of each prediction, and use the shape model to restrict and correct the sampling region. Our approach combines the low computational cost typical of regression-based approaches with the robustness of exhaustive-search approaches. The proposed algorithm was tested on over 7,500 images from 5 databases. Results showed significant improvement over the current state of the art.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.205")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: A Convex Formulation for Learning a Shared Predictive Structure from Multiple Tasks") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.189") (description nil "In this paper, we consider the problem of learning from multiple related tasks for improved generalization performance by extracting their shared structures. The alternating structure optimization (ASO) algorithm which couples all tasks using a shared feature representation has been applied successfully in various multi-task learning problems. However, ASO is nonconvex and the alternating algorithm only finds a local solution. We first present an improved ASO formulation (iASO) for multitask learning based on a new regularizer. We then convert iASO, a non-convex formulation, into a relaxed convex one (rASO). Interestingly, our theoretical analysis reveals that rASO finds a globally optimal solution to its non-convex counterpart iASO under certain conditions. rASO can be equivalently reformulated as a semidefinite program (SDP), which is, however, not scalable to large datasets. We propose to employ the block coordinate descent (BCD) method and the accelerated projected gradient (APG) algorithm separately to find the globally optimal solution to rASO; we also develop efficient algorithms for solving the key subproblems involved in BCD and APG. The experiments on the Yahoo web pages datasets and the Drosophila gene expression pttern images datasets demonstrate the effectiveness and efficiency of the proposed algorithms and confirm our theoretical analysis.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.189")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Online Feature Selection with Streaming Features") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.197") (description nil "We propose a new online feature selection framework for applications with streaming features where features are supplied continuously and the knowledge of the full feature space is unknown in advance. We define streaming features as features that flow one by one over time although the number of training examples remains fixed. This is in contrast with traditional online learning methods that only deal with sequentially added observations, with little attention being paid to streaming features. The critical challenges for online streaming feature selection include: (1) the continuous growth of feature volumes over time; (2) a very large feature space, possibly of unknown or infinite size; and (3) the unavailability of all features before feature selection starts. In the paper, we present a novel Online Streaming Feature Selection (OSFS) method to select strongly relevant and non-redundant features on the fly. An efficient Fast-OSFS algorithm is proposed to improve feature selection performance. The proposed algorithms are evaluated extensively on high-dimensional datasets and also with a real-world case study on impact crater detection. Experimental results demonstrate that the algorithms achieve better compactness and higher accuracy than existing streaming feature selection algorithms.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.197")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Iterative Quantization: A Procrustean Approach to Learning Binary Codes for Large-scale Image Retrieval") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.193") (description nil "This paper addresses the problem of learning similarity-preserving binary codes for efficient similarity search in large-scale image collections. We formulate this problem in terms of finding a rotation of zero-centered data so as to minimize the quantization error of mapping this data to the vertices of a zero-centered binary hypercube, and propose a simple and efficient alternating minimization algorithm to accomplish this task. This algorithm, dubbed iterative quantization (ITQ), has connections to multi-class spectral clustering and to the orthogonal Procrustes problem, and it can be used both with unsupervised data embeddings such as PCA and supervised embeddings such as canonical correlation analysis (CCA). The resulting binary codes significantly outperform several other state-of-the-art methods. We also show that further performance improvements can result from transforming the data with a nonlinear kernel mapping prior to PCA or CCA. Finally, we demonstrate an application of ITQ to learning binary attributes or \"classemes\" on the ImageNet dataset.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.193")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Multiple Target Tracking by Learning Based Hierarchical Association of Detection Responses") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.159") (description nil "We propose a learning-based hierarchical association approach to multiple target tracking from a single camera by progressively linking detection responses into longer track fragments (i.e., tracklets). This approach consists of two key components: a hierarchical association framework and a novel learn method for tracklet affinity models. The association of tracklets at each level of the hierarchy is formulated as a Maximum A Posteriori (MAP) problem that can be efficiently resolved by the Hungarian algorithm; the learning of tracklet affinity models is converted into a bag ranking problem so that a set of weak affinity models upon various features can be combined together to achieve satisfactory accuracy. The experiments conducted on two challenging data sets (CAVIAR and TRECVID08) show that our proposed approach achieves compelling accuracy of tracking multiple inter-occluded targets in crowded environments.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.159")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: 3D Stochastic Completion Fields for Mapping Connectivity in Diffusion MRI") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.184") (description nil "The 2D stochastic completion field algorithm, introduced by Williams and Jacobs [1], [2], uses a directional random walk to model the prior probability of completion curves in the plane. This construct has had a powerful impact in computer vision, where it has been used to compute the shapes of likely completion curves between edge fragments in visual imagery. Motivated by these developments we extend the algorithm to 3D, using a spherical harmonics basis to achieve a rotation invariant computational solution to the Fokker-Planck equation describing the evolution of the probability density function underlying the model. This provides a principled way to compute 3D completion patterns and to derive connectivity measures for orientation data in 3D, as arises in 3D tracking, motion capture and medical imaging. We demonstrate the utility of the approach for the particular case of diffusion magnetic resonance imaging, where we derive connectivity maps for synthetic data, on a physical phantom and on an in vivo high angular resolution diffusion image of a human brain.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.184")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: A Prototype Learning Framework using EMD: Application to Complex Scenes Analysis") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.131") (description nil "In the last decades, many efforts have been devoted to develop methods for automatic scene understanding in the context of video surveillance applications. This paper presents a novel non-object centric approach for complex scene analysis. Similarly to previous methods, we use low-level cues to individuate atomic activities and create clip histograms. Differently from recent works, the task of discovering high-level activity patterns is formulated as a convex prototype learning problem. This problem results into a simple linear program that can be solved efficiently with standard solvers. The main advantage of our approach is that, using as objective function the Earth Mover's Distance (EMD), the similarity among elementary activities is taken into account in the learning phase. To improve scalability we also consider some variants of EMD adopting L1 as ground distance for one and two dimensional, linear and circular histograms. As in these cases only the similarity between neighboring atomic activities is taken into account, we also propose an automatic strategy for sorting them. Experimental results on publicly available datasets show that our method compares favorably with state-of-the-art approaches, often outperforming them.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.131")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Monocular Visual Scene Understanding: Understanding Multi-Object Traffic Scenes") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.174") (description nil "Following recent advances in detection, context modeling and tracking, scene understanding has been the focus of renewed interest in computer vision research. This paper presents a novel probabilistic 3D scene model that integrates state-of-the-art multi-class object detection, object tracking and scene labeling together with geometric 3D reasoning. Our model is able to represent complex object interactions such as inter-object occlusion, physical exclusion between objects, and geometric context. Inference in this model allows to jointly recover the 3D scene context and perform 3D multi-object tracking from a mobile observer, for objects of multiple categories, using only monocular video as input. Contrary to many other approaches our system performs explicit occlusion reasoning and is therefore capable of tracking objects that are partially occluded for extended periods of time, or objects that have never been observed to their full extent. In addition, we show that a joint scene tracklet model for the evidence collected over multiple frames substantially improves performance. The approach is evaluated for different types of challenging onboard sequences. We first show a substantial improvement to the state-of-the-art in 3D multi-people tracking. Moreover, a similar performance gain is achieved for multi-class 3D tracking of cars and trucks on a challenging dataset.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.174")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Optimizing Non-Decomposable Loss Functions in Structured Prediction") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.168") (description nil "We develop an algorithm for structured prediction with non-decomposable performance measures. The algorithm learns parameters of Markov random fields and can be applied to multivariate performance measures. Examples include performance measures such as F_\\beta score (natural language processing), intersection over union (object category segmentation), Precision/Recall at k (search engines) and ROC area (binary classifiers). We attack this optimization problem by approximating the loss function with a piecewise linear function. The loss augmented inference forms a quadratic program (QP), which we solve using LP relaxation. We apply this approach to two tasks: object class-specific segmentation and human action retrieval from videos. We show significant improvement over baseline approaches that either use simple loss functions or simple scoring functions on the PASCAL VOC and H3D Segmentation datasets, and a nursing home action recognition dataset.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.168")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Comparative Analysis and Fusion of Spatio-Temporal Information for Footstep Recognition") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.164") (description nil "Footstep recognition is a relatively new biometric, which aims to discriminate persons using walking characteristics extracted from floor-based sensors. This paper reports for the first time a comparative assessment of the spatio-temporal information contained in the footstep signals for person recognition. Experiments are carried out on the largest footstep database collected to date, with almost 20,000 valid footstep signals and more than 120 persons. Results show very similar performance for both spatial and temporal approaches (5% to 15% EER depending on the experimental setup), and a significant improvement is achieved for their fusion (2.5% to 10% EER). The assessment protocol is focused on the influence of the quantity of data used in the reference models, which serves to simulate conditions of different potential applications such as smart homes or security access scenarios.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.164")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Fast Cost-Volume Filtering for Visual Correspondence and Beyond") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.156") (description nil "Many computer vision tasks can be formulated as labeling problems. The desired solution is often a spatially smooth labeling where label transitions are aligned with color edges of the input image. We show that such solutions can be efficiently achieved by smoothing the label costs with a very fast edge-preserving filter. In this paper we propose a generic and simple framework comprising three steps: (i) Constructing a cost volume; (ii) Fast cost volume filtering; and (iii) Winner-Takes-All label selection. Our main contribution is to show that with such a simple framework state-of-the-art results can be achieved for several computer vision applications. In particular, we achieve (i) disparity maps in real-time, whose quality exceeds those of all other fast (local) approaches on the Middlebury stereo benchmark, and (ii) optical flow fields which contain very fine structures as well as large displacements. To demonstrate robustness, the few parameters of our framework are set to nearly identical values for both applications. Also, competitive results for interactive image segmentation are presented. With this work, we hope to inspire other researchers to leverage this framework to other application areas.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.156")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Robust Visual Tracking using an Adaptive Coupled-layer Visual Model") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.145") (description nil "This paper addresses the problem of tracking objects which undergo rapid and significant appearance changes. We propose a novel coupled-layer visual model that combines the target's global and local appearance by interlacing two layers. The local layer in this model is a set of local patches that geometrically constrain the changes in the target's appearance. This layer probabilistically adapts to the target's geometric deformation, while its structure is updated by removing and adding the local patches. The addition of these patches is constrained by the global layer that probabilistically models target's global visual properties such as color, shape and apparent local motion. The global visual properties are updated during tracking using the stable patches from the local layer. By this coupled constraint paradigm between the adaptation of the global and the local layer, we achieve a more robust tracking through significant appearance changes. We experimentally compare our tracker to eleven state-of-the-art trackers. The experimental results on challenging sequences confirm that our tracker outperforms the related trackers in many cases by having smaller failure rate as well as better accuracy. Furthermore, the parameter analysis shows that our tracker is stable over a range of parameter values.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.145")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: A Globally-Variant Locally-Constant Model for Fusion of Labels from Multiple Diverse Experts Without Using Reference Labels") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.139") (description nil "It has been shown that fusion of categorical labels from multiple experts - humans or machine classifiers - improves the accuracy and generalizability of the overall classification system. Simple plurality is a popular technique for performing this fusion, but it gives equal importance to labels from all experts who may not be equally reliable and consistent across the data set. Estimation of expert reliability without knowing the reference labels is however a challenging problem. Most previous works deal with these challenges by modeling expert reliability as constant over the entire data (feature) space. This paper presents a model based on the consideration that in dealing with real-world data, expert reliability is variable over the complete feature space but constant over local clusters of homogeneous instances. This model jointly learns a classifier and expert reliability parameters without assuming the knowledge of reference labels using the Expectation-Maximization algorithm. Classification experiments on simulated data, data from the UCI Machine Learning Repository and two emotional speech classification datasets show the benefits of the proposed model. Using a metric based on the Jensen-Shannon divergence, we empirically show that the proposed model gives greater benefit for data sets where expert reliability is highly variable over the feature space.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.139")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Recognition using Specular Highlights") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.127") (description nil "We present a novel approach to pose estimation and model-based recognition of specular objects in difficult viewing conditions, such as low illumination, cluttered background, and large highlights and shadows that appear on the object of interest. In such challenging conditions conventional features are unreliable. We show that under the assumption of a dominant light source, specular highlights produced by a known object can be used to establish correspondence between its image and the 3D model, and to verify the hypothesized pose and the identity of the object. Previous methods that use highlights for recognition make limiting assumptions such as known pose, scene-dependent calibration, simple shape, etc. The proposed method can efficiently recognize free form specular objects in arbitrary pose and under unknown lighting direction. It uses only a single image of the object as its input and outputs object identity and the full pose. We have performed extensive experiments for both recognition and pose estimation accuracy, on synthetic images and on real indoor and outdoor images.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.127")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Automatic Caption Generation for News Images") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.118") (description nil "This paper is concerned with the task of automatically generating captions for images, which is important for many image-related applications. Our approach leverages the vast resource of pictures available on the web and the fact that many of them are captioned and co-located with thematically related documents. Our model learns to create captions from a database of news articles, the pictures embedded in them, and their captions and consists of two stages. Content selection identifies what the image and accompanying article are about, whereas surface realization determines how to verbalize the chosen content. We approximate content selection with a probabilistic image annotation model that suggests keywords for an image. The model postulates that images and their textual descriptions are generated by a shared set of latent variables (topics), and is trained on a weakly-labeled dataset (which treats the captions and associated news articles as image labels). Inspired by recent work in summarization, we propose extractive and abstractive surface realization models. Experimental results show that it is viable to generate captions that are pertinent to the specific content of an image and its associated article, while permitting creativity in the description. Indeed, the output of our abstractive model compares favorably to hand-written captions and is often superior to extractive methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.118")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Robust Simultaneous Registration and Segmentation with Sparse Error Reconstruction") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.103") (description nil "We introduce a fast and efficient variational framework for simultaneous registration and segmentation applicable to a wide variety of image sequences. We demonstrate that a dense correspondence map (between consecutive frames) can be reconstructed correctly even in the presence of partial occlusion, shading and reflections. The errors are efficiently handled by exploiting their sparse nature. In addition, the segmentation functional is reformulated using a dual Rudin-Osher-Fatemi (ROF) model for fast implementation. Moreover, non-parametric shape prior terms that are suited for this dual-ROF model are proposed. The efficacy of the proposed method is validated with extensive experiments on both indoor, outdoor natural and biological image sequences demonstrating the higher accuracy and efficiency compared to various state-of-the-art methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.103")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Tree-structured CRF Models for Interactive Image Labeling") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.100") (description nil "We propose structured prediction models for image labeling that explicitly take into account dependencies among image labels. In our tree structured models, image labels are nodes, and edges encode dependency relations. To allow for more complex dependencies, we combine labels in a single node, and use mixtures of trees. Our models are more expressive than independent predictors, and lead to more accurate label predictions. The gain becomes more significant in an interactive scenario where a user provides the value of some of the image labels at test time. Such an interactive scenario offers an interesting trade-off between label accuracy and manual labeling effort. The structured models are used to decide which labels should be set by the user, and transfer the user input to more accurate predictions on other image labels. We also apply our models to attribute-based image classification, where attribute predictions of a test image are mapped to class probabilities by means of a given attribute-class mapping. Experimental results on three publicly available benchmark data sets show that in all scenarios our structured models lead to more accurate predictions, and leverage user input much more effectively than state-of-the-art independent models.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.100")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Characterizing Humans on Riemannian Manifolds") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.263") (description nil "In surveillance applications, head and body orientation of people is of primary importance for assessing many behavioural traits. Unfortunately, in this context people is often encoded by few, noisy pixels, so that their characterization is difficult. We face this issue, proposing a computational framework which is based on an expressive descriptor, the covariance of features. Covariances have been employed for pedestrian detection purposes, actually, a binary classification problem on Riemannian manifolds. In this paper, we show how to extend to the multi-classification case, presenting a novel descriptor, named Weighted ARray of COvariances, WARCO, especially suited for dealing with tiny image representations. The extension requires a novel differential geometry approach, in which covariances are projected on a unique tangent space, where standard machine learning techniques can be applied. In particular, we adopt the Campbell-Baker-Hausdorff expansion as a means to approximate on the tangent space the genuine (geodesic) distances on the manifold, in a very efficient way. We test our methodology on multiple benchmark datasets, and also propose new testing sets, getting convincing results in all the cases.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.263")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Hierarchical Object Parsing from Structured Noisy Point Clouds") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.262") (description nil "Object parsing and segmentation from point clouds are challenging tasks because the relevant data is available only as thin structures along object boundaries or other features, and is corrupted by large amounts of noise. To handle this kind of data, flexible shape models are desired that can accurately follow the object boundaries. Popular models such as Active Shape and Active Appearance models lack the necessary flexibility for this task, while recent approaches such as the Recursive Compositional Models make model simplifications in order to obtain computational guarantees. This paper investigates a hierarchical Bayesian model of shape and appearance in a generative setting. The input data is explained by an object parsing layer, which is a deformation of a hidden PCA shape model with Gaussian prior. The paper also introduces a novel efficient inference algorithm that uses informed data-driven proposals to initialize local searches for the hidden variables. Applied to the problem of object parsing from structured point clouds such as edge detection images, the proposed approach obtains state of the art parsing errors on two standard datasets without using any intensity information.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.262")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Articulated Human Detection with Flexible Mixtures-of-Parts") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.261") (description nil "We describe a method for articulated human detection and human pose estimation in static images based on a new representation of deformable part models. Rather than modeling articulation using a family of warped (rotated and foreshortened) templates, we use a mixture of small, non-oriented parts. We describe a general, flexible mixture model that jointly captures spatial relations between part locations and co-occurence relations between part mixtures, augmenting standard pictorial structure models that encode just spatial relations. Our models have several notable properties: (1) they efficiently model articulation by sharing computation across similar warps (2) they efficiently model an exponentially-large set of global mixtures through composition of local mixtures and (3) they capture the dependency of global geometry on local appearance (parts look different at different locations). When relations are tree-structured, our models can be efficiently optimized with dynamic programming. We introduce novel criteria for evaluating pose estimation and human detection, both separately and jointly. We show that currently-used evaluation criteria may conflate these two issues. We present experimental results on standard benchmarks that suggest our approach is the state-of-the-art system for pose estimation, improving past work on the challenging Parse and Buffy datasets, while being orders of magnitude faster.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.261")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Joint Albedo Estimation and Pose Tracking from Video") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.249") (description nil "The albedo of a Lambertian object is a surface property that contributes to an object's appearance under changing illumination. As a signature independent of illumination, the albedo is useful for object recognition. Single image-based albedo estimation algorithms suffer due to shadows and non-Lambertian effects of the image. In this paper, we propose a sequential algorithm to estimate the albedo from a sequence of images of a known 3D object in varying poses and illumination conditions. We first show that by knowing/estimating the pose of the object at each frame of a sequence, the object's albedo can be efficiently estimated using a Kalman filter. We then extend this for the case of unknown pose by simultaneously tracking the pose as well as updating the albedo through a Rao-Blackwellized particle filter. More specifically, the albedo is marginalized from the posterior distribution and estimated analytically using the Kalman filter, while the pose parameters are estimated using importance sampling and by minimizing the projection error of the face onto its spherical harmonic subspace, which results in an illumination-insensitive pose tracking algorithm. Illustrations and experiments are provided to validate the effectiveness of the approach using various synthetic and real sequences followed by applications to unconstrained, video-based face recognition.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.249")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: USAC: A Universal Framework for Random Sample Consensus") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.257") (description nil "A computational problem that arises frequently in computer vision is that of estimating the parameters of a model from data that has been contaminated by noise and outliers. More generally, any practical system that seeks to estimate quantities from noisy data measurements must some means of dealing with data contamination. The Random Sample Consensus (RANSAC) algorithm is one of the most popular tools for robust estimation. Recent years have seen an explosion of activity in this area, leading to the development of a number of techniques that improve upon the efficiency and robustness of the basic algorithm. In this paper, we present a comprehensive overview of recent research in RANSAC-based robust estimation, by analyzing various approaches that have been explored over the years. We provide a common context for this analysis by introducing a new framework, which we call Universal RANSAC (USAC). USAC extends the hypothesize-and-verify structure of RANSAC to incorporate a number of important practical and computational considerations. In addition, we provide a general-purpose C++ software library that implements the USAC framework by leveraging state of the art algorithms for the various modules. The implementation we provide can be used by researchers either as a stand-alone tool for robust estimation, or as a benchmark for evaluating new techniques.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.257")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Higher-Order Partial Least Squares (HOPLS): A Generalized Multi-Linear Regression Method") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.254") (description nil "A new generalized multilinear regression model, termed the Higher-Order Partial Least Squares (HOPLS), is introduced with the aim to predict a tensor (multiway array) &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;Y&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; from a tensor &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;X&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; through projecting the data onto the latent space and performing regression on the corresponding latent variables. HOPLS differs substantially from other regression models in that it explains the data by a sum of orthogonal Tucker tensors, while the number of orthogonal loadings serves as a parameter to control model complexity and prevent overfitting. The low dimensional latent space is optimized sequentially via a deflation operation, yielding the best joint subspace approximation for both &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;X&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; and &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;Y&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt;. Instead of decomposing &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;X&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; and &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;Y&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; individually, higher order singular value decomposition on a newly defined generalized cross-covariance tensor is employed to optimize the orthogonal loadings. A systematic comparison on both synthetic data and real-world decoding of 3D movement trajectories from electrocorticogram (ECoG) signals demonstrate the advantages of HOPLS over the existing methods in terms of better predictive ability, suitability to handle small sample sizes, and robustness to noise.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.254")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Parsing Facades with Shape Grammars and Reinforcement Learning") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.252") (description nil "In this work we use Shape Grammars for Facade Parsing, which amounts to segmenting 2D building facades into balconies, walls, windows and doors in an architecturally meaningful manner. The main thrust of our work is the introduction of Reinforcement Learning (RL) techniques to deal with the computational complexity of the problem. RL provides us with efficient tools such as Q-learning and state aggregation which we exploit to accelerate facade parsing. We initially phrase the 1D parsing problem in terms of Markov Decision Processes, paving the way for the application of RL-based tools. We then develop novel techniques for the 2D shape parsing problem that take into account the specificities of the facade parsing problem. Specifically, we use state aggregation to enforce the symmetry of facade floors and also demonstrate that RL can seamlessly exploit bottom-up, image-based guidance during optimization. We provide systematic results on the Paris building dataset and obtain state-of-the-art results in a fraction of the time required by previous methods. We validate our method under diverse imaging conditions and make our software and results available online.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.252")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Color Invariants for Person Re-Identification") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.246") (description nil "We revisit the problem of specific object recognition using color distributions. In some applications - such as specific person identification - it is highly likely that the color distributions will be multimodal and hence contain a special structure. Although the color distribution changes under different lighting conditions, some aspects of its structure turn out to be invariants. We refer to this structure as an intra-distribution structure, and show that it is invariant under a wide range of imaging conditions while being discriminative enough to be practical. Our signature uses shape context descriptors to represent the intra-distribution structure. Assuming the widely used diagonal model, we validate that our signature is invariant under certain illumination changes. Experimentally, we use color information as the only cue to obtain good recognition performance on publicly available databases covering both indoors and outdoors conditions. Combining our approach with the complementary covariance descriptor, we demonstrate results exceeding the state of the art performance on the challenging VIPeR and CAVIAR4REID databases.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.246")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Bayesian Estimation of Turbulent Motion") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.232") (description nil "Based on physical laws describing the multi-scale structure of turbulent flows, this article proposes a regularizer for fluid motion estimation from an image sequence. Regularization is achieved by imposing some scale invariance property between histograms of motion increments computed at different scales. By reformulating this problem from a Bayesian perspective, an algorithm is proposed to jointly estimate motion, regularization hyper-parameters, and to select the most likely physical prior among a set of models. Hyper-parameter and model inference is conducted by posterior maximization, obtained by marginalizing out non-Gaussian motion variables. The Bayesian estimator is assessed on several image sequences depicting synthetic and real turbulent fluid flows. Results obtained with the proposed approach exceed the state of the art results in fluid flow estimation.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.232")) (item nil (title nil "IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence - Jan. 2013 (Vol. 35, No. 1)") (link nil "http://opac.ieeecomputersociety.org/opac?year=2013&volume=35&issue=01&acronym=tpami") (description nil "IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://www.computer.org/portal/site/tpami/")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: A Framework for Binding and Retrieving Class-Specific Information to and from Image Patterns using Correlation Filters") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.244") (description nil "We describe a template-based framework to bind class-specific information to a set of image patterns and retrieve that information by matching the template to a query pattern of the same class. This is done by mapping the class-specific information to a set of spatial translations which are applied to the set of image patterns from which a template is designed taking advantage of the properties of correlation filters. The bound information is retrieved during matching with an authentic query by estimating the spatial translations applied to the images that were used to design the template. In this paper we focus on the problem of binding information to biometric signatures as an application of our framework. Our framework is flexible enough to allow spreading the information to be bound over multiple pattern classes which in the context of biometric key-binding enables multi-class and multi-modal biometric key-binding. We demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed scheme via extensive numerical results on multiple biometric databases.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.244")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Automatic Relevance Determination in Nonnegative Matrix Factorization with the {beta}-Divergence") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.240") (description nil "This paper addresses the estimation of the latent dimensionality in nonnegative matrix factorization (NMF) with the $\\beta$-divergence. The $\\beta$-divergence is a family of cost functions that includes the squared Euclidean distance, Kullback-Leibler and Itakura-Saito divergences as special cases. Learning the model order is important as it is necessary to strike the right balance between data fidelity and overfitting. We propose a Bayesian model based on {\\em automatic relevance determination} in which the columns of the dictionary matrix and the rows of the activation matrix are tied together through a common scale parameter in their prior. A family of majorization-minimization algorithms is proposed for maximum a posteriori (MAP) estimation. A subset of scale parameters is driven to a small lower bound in the course of inference, with the effect of pruning the corresponding spurious components. We demonstrate the efficacy and robustness of our algorithms by performing extensive experiments on synthetic data, the \"swimmer\" dataset, a music decomposition example and a stock price prediction task.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.240")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Coupled Gaussian Processes for Pose-Invariant Facial Expression Recognition") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.233") (description nil "We propose a method for head-pose invariant facial expression recognition that is based on a set of characteristic facial points. To achieve head-pose invariance, we propose the Coupled Scaled Gaussian Process Regression (CSGPR) model for head-pose normalization. In this model, we first learn independently the mappings between the facial points in each pair of (discrete) non-frontal poses and the frontal pose, and then perform their coupling in order to capture dependencies between them. During inference, the outputs of the coupled functions from different poses are combined using a gating function, devised based on the head-pose estimation for the query points. The proposed model outperforms state-of-the-art regression-based approaches to head-pose normalization, 2D and 3D Point Distribution Models (PDMs), and Active Appearance Models (AAMs), especially in cases of unknown poses and imbalanced training data. To the best of our knowledge, the proposed method is the first one that is able to deal with expressive faces in the range from $-45^\\circ$ to $+45^\\circ$ pan rotation and $-30^\\circ$ to $+30^\\circ$ tilt rotation, and with continuous changes in head pose, despite the fact that training was conducted on a small set of discrete poses. We evaluate the proposed method on synthetic and real images depicting acted and spontaneously displayed facial expressions.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.233")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Learning Hierarchical Features for Scene Labeling") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.231") (description nil "Scene labeling consists in labeling each pixel in an image with the category of the object it belongs to. We propose a method that uses a multiscale convolutional network trained from raw pixels to extract dense feature vectors that encode regions of multiple sizes centered on each pixel. The method alleviates the need for engineered features, and produces a powerful representation that captures texture, shape and contextual information. We report results using multiple post-processing methods to produce the final labeling. Among those, we propose a technique to automatically retrieve, from a pool of segmentation components, an optimal set of components that best explain the scene; these components are arbitrary, e.g. they can be taken from a segmentation tree, or from any family of over-segmentations. The system yields record accuracies on the Sift Flow Dataset (33 classes) and the Barcelona Dataset (170 classes) and near-record accuracy on Stanford Background Dataset (8 classes), while being an order of magnitude faster than competing approaches, producing a 320x240 image labeling in less than a second, including feature extraction.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.231")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Invariant Scattering Convolution Networks") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.230") (description nil "A wavelet scattering network computes a translation invariant image representation, which is stable to deformations and preserves high frequency information for classification. It cascades wavelet transform convolutions with non-linear modulus and averaging operators. The first network layer outputs SIFT-type descriptors whereas the next layers provide complementary invariant information which improves classification. The mathematical analysis of wavelet scattering networks explain important properties of deep convolution networks for classification. A scattering representation of stationary processes incorporates higher order moments and can thus discriminate textures having same Fourier power spectrum. State of the art classification results are obtained for handwritten digits and texture discrimination, with a Gaussian kernel SVM and a generative PCA classifier.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.230")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Heterogeneous Face Recognition using Kernel Prototype Similarities") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.229") (description nil "Heterogeneous face recognition (HFR) involves matching two face images from alternate imaging modalities, such as an infrared image to a photograph, or a sketch to a photograph. Accurate HFR systems are of great value in various applications (e.g., forensics and surveillance), where the gallery databases are populated with photographs (e.g. mug shot or passport photographs) but the probe images are often limited to some alternate modality. A generic HFR framework is proposed in which both probe and gallery images are represented in terms of non-linear similarities to a collection of prototype face images. The prototype subjects (i.e., the training set) have an image in each modality (probe and gallery), and the similarity of an image is measured against the prototype images from the corresponding modality. The accuracy of this non-linear prototype representation is is improved by projecting the features into a linear discriminant subspace. Random sampling is introduced into the HFR framework to better handle challeges arising from the small sample size problem. The merits of the proposed approach, called Prototype Random Subspace (P-RS), is demostrated on four different heterogeneous scenarios: (i) near infrared to photograph, (ii) thermal to photograph, (iii) viewed sketch to photograph, and (iv) forensic sketch to photograph.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.229")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Fourier Lucas-Kanade Algorithm") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.220") (description nil "In this paper we propose a framework for both gradient descent image and object alignment in the Fourier domain. Our method centers upon the classical Lucas &amp; Kanade (LK) algorithm where we represent the source and template/model in the complex 2D Fourier domain rather than in the spatial 2D domain. We refer to our approach as the Fourier LK (FLK) algorithm. The FLK formulation is advantageous when one pre-processes the source image and template/model with a bank of filters (e.g. oriented edges, Gabor, etc.) as: (i) it can handle substantial illumination variations, (ii) the inefficient pre-processing filter bank step can be subsumed within the FLK algorithm as a sparse diagonal weighting matrix, (iii) unlike traditional LK the computational cost is invariant to the number of filters and as a result far more efficient, and (iv) this approach can be extended to the inverse compositional form of the LK algorithm where nearly all steps (including Fourier transform and filter bank pre-processing) can be pre-computed leading to an extremely efficient and robust approach to gradient descent image matching. Further, these computational savings translate to non-rigid object alignment tasks that are considered extensions of the LK algorithm such as those found in Active Appearance Models (AAMs).") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.220")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Guided Image Filtering") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.213") (description nil "In this paper we propose a novel explicit image filter called guided filter. Derived from a local linear model, the guided filter computes the filtering output by considering the content of a guidance image, which can be the input image itself or another different image. The guided filter can be used as an edge-preserving smoothing operator like the popular bilateral filter, but has better behaviors near edges. The guided filter is also a more generic concept beyond smoothing: it can transfer the structures of the guidance image to the filtering output, enabling new filtering applications like dehazing and guided feathering. Moreover, the guided filter naturally has a fast and non-approximate linear time algorithm, regardless of the kernel size and the intensity range. Currently it is one of the fastest edge-preserving filters. Experiments show that the guided filter is both effective and efficient in a great variety of computer vision and computer graphics applications including edge-aware smoothing, detail enhancement, HDR compression, image matting/feathering, dehazing, joint upsampling, etc.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.213")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Inverse Rendering of Faces with a 3D Morphable Model") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.206") (description nil "In this paper, we present a complete framework to inverse render faces with a 3D Morphable Model (3DMM). By decomposing the image formation process into a geometric and photometric part, we are able to state the problem as a multilinear system which can be solved accurately and efficiently. As we treat each contribution as independent, the objective function is convex in the parameters and a global solution is guaranteed. We start by recovering 3D shape using a novel algorithm which incorporates generalisation error of the model obtained from empirical measurements. We then describe two methods to recover facial texture, diffuse lighting, specular reflectance and camera properties from a single image. The methods make increasingly weak assumptions and can be solved in a linear fashion. We evaluate our findings on a publicly available database, where we are able to outperform an existing state-of-the-art algorithm. We demonstrate the usability of the recovered parameters in a recognition experiment conducted on the CMU-PIE database.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.206")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Linear Dependency Modeling for Classifier Fusion and Feature Combination") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.198") (description nil "This paper addresses the independent assumption issue in fusion process. In the last decade, dependency modeling techniques were developed under a specific distribution of classifiers or by estimating the joint distribution of the posterior. This paper proposes a new framework to model the dependency between features without any assumption on feature/classifier distribution, and overcome the difficulty in estimating the high-dimensional joint distribution. In this paper, we prove that feature dependency can be modeled by a linear combination of the posterior probabilities under some mild assumptions. Based on the linear combination property, two methods, namely Linear Classifier Dependency Modeling (LCDM) and Linear Feature Dependency Modeling (LFDM), are derived and developed for dependency modeling in classifier level and feature level, respectively. The optimal models for LCDM and LFDM are learned by maximizing the margin between the genuine and imposter posterior probabilities. Both synthetic data and real datasets are used for experiments. Experimental results show that LCDM and LFDM with dependency modeling outperform existing classifier level and feature level combination methods under non-normal distributions and on four real databases, respectively. Comparing the classifier level and feature level fusion methods, LFDM gives the best performance.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.198")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Multiscale Local Phase Quantisation for Robust Component-based Face Recognition using Kernel Fusion of Multiple Descriptors") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.199") (description nil "Face recognition subject to uncontrolled illumination and blur is challenging. Interestingly, image degradation caused by blurring has mostly been overlooked by the face recognition community. We propose a number of counter-measures designed to achieve system robustness to blurring. First, we propose a novel blur-robust face image descriptor based on Local Phase Quantisation (LPQ) and extend it to a multiscale framework (MLPQ) to increase its effectiveness. To maximise the insensitivity to misalignment, the MLPQ descriptor is computed regionally, by adopting a component-based framework. Second, the regional features are combined using kernel fusion. Third, the proposed MLPQ representation is combined with the Multiscale Local Binary Pattern (MLBP) descriptor using kernel fusion to increase insensitivity to illumination. Kernel Discriminant Analysis (KDA) of the combined features extracts discriminative information for face recognition. Last, two geometric normalisations are used to generate and combine multiple scores from different face image scales to enhance the accuracy further. The proposed approach has been comprehensively evaluated using several well-known databases. The combined system is comparable to the state of the art approaches using similar system configurations. The reported work provides a new insight into the merits of various face representation and fusion methods, as well as their role in dealing with variable lighting and blur degradation.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.199")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Tracking People's Hands and Feet using Mixed Network AND/OR Search") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.187") (description nil "We describe a framework that leverages mixed probabilistic and deterministic networks and their AND/OR search space to efficiently find and track the hands and feet of multiple interacting humans in 2D from a single camera view. Our framework detects and tracks multiple people's heads, hands, and feet through partial or full occlusion; requires few constraints (does not require multiple views, high image resolution, knowledge of performed activities, or large training sets); and makes use of constraints and AND/OR Branch-and-Bound with lazy evaluation and carefully computed bounds to efficiently solve the complex network that results from the consideration of inter-person occlusion. Our main contributions are 1) a multi-person part-based formulation that emphasizes extremities and allows for the globally optimal solution to be obtained in each frame, and 2) an efficient and exact optimization scheme that relies on AND/OR Branch-and-Bound, lazy factor evaluation, and factor cost sensitive bottom-up bound computation. We demonstrate our approach on three datasets: the public single person HumanEva dataset, outdoor sequences where multiple people interact in a group meeting scenario, and outdoor one-on-one basketball videos. The first dataset demonstrates that our framework achieves state-of-the-art performance in the single person setting, while the last two demonstrate robustness in the presence of partial and full occlusion and fast non-trivial motion.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.187")) (item nil (title nil "PrePrint: Self-Calibration of Catadioptric Camera with Two Planar Mirrors from Silhouettes") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.195") (description nil "If an object is inter-reflected between two planar mirrors, we may take an image containing both the object and its multiple reflections, i.e., simultaneously imaging multiple views of an object by a single pinhole camera. This paper emphasizes the problem of recovering both the intrinsic and extrinsic parameters of the camera using multiple silhouettes from one single image. View pairs among views in a single image can be divided into two kinds by the relationship between the two views in the pair: reflected by some mirror (real or virtual), and in circular motion. Epipoles in the first kind of pairs can be easily determined from intersections of common tangent lines of silhouettes. Based on projective properties of these epipoles, efficient methods are proposed to recover both the imaged circular points and the included angle between two mirrors. Epipoles in the second kind of pairs can be recovered simultaneously with the projection of intersection line between two mirrors, by solving a simple one dimensional optimization problem using the consistency constraint of epipolar tangent lines. Fundamental matrices among views in a single image are all recovered. Using the estimated intrinsic and extrinsic parameters of the camera, a euclidean reconstruction can be obtained. Experiments validate the proposed approach.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.195")))) ("PrePrint: Calibration of Smooth Camera Models" "Generic imaging models can be used to represent any camera. Current generic models are discrete and define a mapping between each pixel in the image and a straight line in 3D space. This paper presents a modification of the generic camera model that allows the simplification of the calibration procedure. The only requirement is that the coordinates of the 3D projecting lines are related by functions that vary smoothly across space. Such model is obtained by modifying the general imaging model using radial basis functions to interpolate image coordinates and 3D lines, thereby allowing both an increase in resolution (due to their continuous nature) and a more compact representation. Using this variation of the general imaging model we also develop a calibration procedure. This procedure only requires that a 3D point be matched to each pixel. In addition not all the pixels need to be calibrated. As a result the complexity of the procedure is significantly decreased. Normalization is applied to the coordinates of both image and 3D points which increases the accuracy of the calibration. Results with both synthetic and real data sets show that the model and calibration procedure are easily applicable and provide accurate calibration results." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.258" (20681 64083 859856) old 1 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Calibration of Smooth Camera Models") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.258") (description nil "Generic imaging models can be used to represent any camera. Current generic models are discrete and define a mapping between each pixel in the image and a straight line in 3D space. This paper presents a modification of the generic camera model that allows the simplification of the calibration procedure. The only requirement is that the coordinates of the 3D projecting lines are related by functions that vary smoothly across space. Such model is obtained by modifying the general imaging model using radial basis functions to interpolate image coordinates and 3D lines, thereby allowing both an increase in resolution (due to their continuous nature) and a more compact representation. Using this variation of the general imaging model we also develop a calibration procedure. This procedure only requires that a 3D point be matched to each pixel. In addition not all the pixels need to be calibrated. As a result the complexity of the procedure is significantly decreased. Normalization is applied to the coordinates of both image and 3D points which increases the accuracy of the calibration. Results with both synthetic and real data sets show that the model and calibration procedure are easily applicable and provide accurate calibration results.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.258"))) ("PrePrint: Clustering Dynamic Textures with the Hierarchical EM Algorithm for Modeling Video" "The dynamic texture (DT) is a probabilistic generative model, defined over space and time, that represents a video as the output of a linear dynamical system (LDS). The DT model has been applied to a wide variety of computer vision problems, such as motion segmentation, motion classification, and video registration. In this paper, we derive a new algorithm for clustering DT models that is based on the hierarchical EM algorithm. The proposed clustering algorithm is capable of both clustering DTs and learning novel DT cluster centers that are representative of the cluster members, in a manner that is consistent with the underlying generative probabilistic model of the DT. We also derive an efficient recursive algorithm for sensitivity analysis of the discrete-time Kalman smoothing filter, which is used as the basis for computing expectations in the E-step of the HEM algorithm. Finally, we demonstrate the efficacy of the clustering algorithm on several applications in motion analysis, including hierarchical motion clustering, semantic motion annotation, and learning bag-of-systems codebooks for dynamic texture recognition." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.236" (20681 64083 859856) old 2 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Clustering Dynamic Textures with the Hierarchical EM Algorithm for Modeling Video") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.236") (description nil "The dynamic texture (DT) is a probabilistic generative model, defined over space and time, that represents a video as the output of a linear dynamical system (LDS). The DT model has been applied to a wide variety of computer vision problems, such as motion segmentation, motion classification, and video registration. In this paper, we derive a new algorithm for clustering DT models that is based on the hierarchical EM algorithm. The proposed clustering algorithm is capable of both clustering DTs and learning novel DT cluster centers that are representative of the cluster members, in a manner that is consistent with the underlying generative probabilistic model of the DT. We also derive an efficient recursive algorithm for sensitivity analysis of the discrete-time Kalman smoothing filter, which is used as the basis for computing expectations in the E-step of the HEM algorithm. Finally, we demonstrate the efficacy of the clustering algorithm on several applications in motion analysis, including hierarchical motion clustering, semantic motion annotation, and learning bag-of-systems codebooks for dynamic texture recognition.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.236"))) ("PrePrint: Image-Based Separation of Reflective and Fluorescent Components using Illumination Variant and Invariant Color" "Traditionally researchers tend to exclude fluorescence from color appearance algorithms in computer vision and image processing because of its complexity. In reality, fluorescence is a very common phenomenon observed in many objects, from gems and corals, to different kinds of writing paper, and to our clothes. In this paper, we provide detailed theories of fluorescence phenomenon. In particular, we show that the color appearance of fluorescence is unaffected by illumination in which it differs from ordinary reflectance. Moreover, we show that the color appearance of objects with reflective and fluorescent components can be represented as a linear combination of the two components. A linear model allows us to separate the two components using images taken under unknown illuminants using independent component analysis(ICA). The effectiveness of the proposed method is demonstrated using digital images of various fluorescent objects." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.255" (20681 64083 859856) old 3 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Image-Based Separation of Reflective and Fluorescent Components using Illumination Variant and Invariant Color") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.255") (description nil "Traditionally researchers tend to exclude fluorescence from color appearance algorithms in computer vision and image processing because of its complexity. In reality, fluorescence is a very common phenomenon observed in many objects, from gems and corals, to different kinds of writing paper, and to our clothes. In this paper, we provide detailed theories of fluorescence phenomenon. In particular, we show that the color appearance of fluorescence is unaffected by illumination in which it differs from ordinary reflectance. Moreover, we show that the color appearance of objects with reflective and fluorescent components can be represented as a linear combination of the two components. A linear model allows us to separate the two components using images taken under unknown illuminants using independent component analysis(ICA). The effectiveness of the proposed method is demonstrated using digital images of various fluorescent objects.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.255"))) ("PrePrint: Keeping a Pan-Tilt-Zoom Camera Calibrated" "Pan-tilt-zoom (PTZ) cameras are pervasive in modern surveillance systems. However, we demonstrate that the (pan, tilt) coordinates reported by PTZ cameras become inaccurate after many hours of operation, endangering tracking and 3D localization algorithms that rely on the accuracy of such values. To solve this problem, we propose a complete model for a pan-tilt-zoom camera that explicitly reflects how focal length and lens distortion vary as a function of zoom scale. We show how the parameters of this model can be quickly and accurately estimated using a series of simple initialization steps followed by a nonlinear optimization. Our method requires only ten images to achieve accurate calibration results. Next, we show how the calibration parameters can be maintained using a one-shot dynamic correction process; this ensures that the camera returns the same field of view every time the user requests a given (pan, tilt, zoom), even after hundreds of hours of operation. The dynamic calibration algorithm is based on matching the current image against a stored feature library created at the time the PTZ camera is mounted. We evaluate the calibration and dynamic correction algorithms on both experimental and real-world datasets, demonstrating the effectiveness of the techniques." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.250" (20681 64083 859856) old 4 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Keeping a Pan-Tilt-Zoom Camera Calibrated") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.250") (description nil "Pan-tilt-zoom (PTZ) cameras are pervasive in modern surveillance systems. However, we demonstrate that the (pan, tilt) coordinates reported by PTZ cameras become inaccurate after many hours of operation, endangering tracking and 3D localization algorithms that rely on the accuracy of such values. To solve this problem, we propose a complete model for a pan-tilt-zoom camera that explicitly reflects how focal length and lens distortion vary as a function of zoom scale. We show how the parameters of this model can be quickly and accurately estimated using a series of simple initialization steps followed by a nonlinear optimization. Our method requires only ten images to achieve accurate calibration results. Next, we show how the calibration parameters can be maintained using a one-shot dynamic correction process; this ensures that the camera returns the same field of view every time the user requests a given (pan, tilt, zoom), even after hundreds of hours of operation. The dynamic calibration algorithm is based on matching the current image against a stored feature library created at the time the PTZ camera is mounted. We evaluate the calibration and dynamic correction algorithms on both experimental and real-world datasets, demonstrating the effectiveness of the techniques.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.250"))) ("PrePrint: Unified Detection and Tracking of Instruments During Retinal Microsurgery" "Methods for tracking an object have generally fallen into two groups: tracking by detection, and tracking through local optimization. The advantage of detection-based tracking is its ability to deal with target appearance and disappearance, but does not naturally take advantage of target motion continuity during detection. The advantage of local optimization is efficiency and accuracy, but requires additional algorithms to initialize tracking when the target is lost. To bridge these two approaches, we propose a framework for unified detection and tracking as a time-series Bayesian estimation problem. The basis of our approach is to treat both detection and tracking as a sequential entropy minimization problem, where the goal is to determine the parameters describing a target in each frame. To do this we integrate the Active Testing paradigm with Bayesian filtering, and this results in a framework capable of both detecting and tracking robustly in situations where the target object enters and leaves the field of view regularly. We demonstrate our approach on a retinal tool tracking problem and show through extensive experiments that our method provides an efficient and robust tracking solution." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.209" (20681 64083 859856) new 5 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Unified Detection and Tracking of Instruments During Retinal Microsurgery") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.209") (description nil "Methods for tracking an object have generally fallen into two groups: tracking by detection, and tracking through local optimization. The advantage of detection-based tracking is its ability to deal with target appearance and disappearance, but does not naturally take advantage of target motion continuity during detection. The advantage of local optimization is efficiency and accuracy, but requires additional algorithms to initialize tracking when the target is lost. To bridge these two approaches, we propose a framework for unified detection and tracking as a time-series Bayesian estimation problem. The basis of our approach is to treat both detection and tracking as a sequential entropy minimization problem, where the goal is to determine the parameters describing a target in each frame. To do this we integrate the Active Testing paradigm with Bayesian filtering, and this results in a framework capable of both detecting and tracking robustly in situations where the target object enters and leaves the field of view regularly. We demonstrate our approach on a retinal tool tracking problem and show through extensive experiments that our method provides an efficient and robust tracking solution.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.209"))) ("PrePrint: Discovering Low-Rank Shared Concept Space for Adapting Text Mining Models" "We propose a framework for adapting text mining models that discovers low-rank shared concept space. Our major characteristic of this concept space is that it explicitly minimizes the distribution gap between the source domain with sufficient labeled data and the target domain with only unlabeled data, while at the same time it minimizes the empirical loss on the labeled data in the source domain. Our method is capable of conducting the domain adaptation task both in the original feature space as well as in the transformed Reproducing Kernel Hilbert Space (RKHS) using kernel tricks. Theoretical analysis guarantees that the error of our adaptation model can be bounded with respect to the embedded distribution gap and the empirical loss in the source domain. We have conducted extensive experiments on two common text mining problems, namely, document classification and information extraction to demonstrate the efficacy of our proposed framework." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.243" (20681 64083 859856) new 6 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Discovering Low-Rank Shared Concept Space for Adapting Text Mining Models") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.243") (description nil "We propose a framework for adapting text mining models that discovers low-rank shared concept space. Our major characteristic of this concept space is that it explicitly minimizes the distribution gap between the source domain with sufficient labeled data and the target domain with only unlabeled data, while at the same time it minimizes the empirical loss on the labeled data in the source domain. Our method is capable of conducting the domain adaptation task both in the original feature space as well as in the transformed Reproducing Kernel Hilbert Space (RKHS) using kernel tricks. Theoretical analysis guarantees that the error of our adaptation model can be bounded with respect to the embedded distribution gap and the empirical loss in the source domain. We have conducted extensive experiments on two common text mining problems, namely, document classification and information extraction to demonstrate the efficacy of our proposed framework.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.243"))) ("PrePrint: Monocular SLAM with Conditionally Independent Split Mapping" "The recovery of structure from motion in real time over extended areas demands methods that mitigate the effects of computational complexity and arithmetical inconsistency. In this paper we develop SCISM, an algorithm based on relative frame bundle adjustment, which splits the recovered map of 3D landmarks and keyframes poses so that the camera can continue to grow and explore a local map in real-time while, at the same time, a bulk map is optimized in the background. By temporarily excluding certain measurements it ensures that both maps are consistent, and by using the relative frame representation new results from the bulk process can update the local process without disturbance. The paper first shows how to apply this representation to the parallel tracking and mapping (PTAM) method, a real-time bundle adjuster, and compares results obtained using global and relative frames. It then explains the relative representation's use in SCISM and describes an implementation using PTAM. The paper provides evidence of the algorithm's real-time operation in outdoor scenes, and includes comparison with a more conventional submapping approach." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.234" (20681 64083 859856) new 7 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Monocular SLAM with Conditionally Independent Split Mapping") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.234") (description nil "The recovery of structure from motion in real time over extended areas demands methods that mitigate the effects of computational complexity and arithmetical inconsistency. In this paper we develop SCISM, an algorithm based on relative frame bundle adjustment, which splits the recovered map of 3D landmarks and keyframes poses so that the camera can continue to grow and explore a local map in real-time while, at the same time, a bulk map is optimized in the background. By temporarily excluding certain measurements it ensures that both maps are consistent, and by using the relative frame representation new results from the bulk process can update the local process without disturbance. The paper first shows how to apply this representation to the parallel tracking and mapping (PTAM) method, a real-time bundle adjuster, and compares results obtained using global and relative frames. It then explains the relative representation's use in SCISM and describes an implementation using PTAM. The paper provides evidence of the algorithm's real-time operation in outdoor scenes, and includes comparison with a more conventional submapping approach.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.234"))) ("PrePrint: A Game-Theoretic Approach to Hypergraph Clustering" "Hypergraph clustering refers to the process of extracting maximally coherent groups from a set of objects using high-order (rather than pairwise) similarities. Traditional approaches to this problem are based on the idea of partitioning the input data into a predetermined number of classes, thereby obtaining the clusters as a by-product of the partitioning process. In this paper, we offer a radically different view of the problem. In contrast to the classical approach, we attempt to provide a meaningful formalization of the very notion of a cluster and we show that game theory offers an attractive and unexplored perspective that serves well our purpose. To this end, we formulate the hypergraph clustering problem in terms of a non-cooperative multi-player \"clustering game,\" and show that a natural notion of a cluster turns out to be equivalent to a classical (evolutionary) game-theoretic equilibrium concept. We prove that the problem of finding the equilibria of our clustering game is equivalent to locally optimizing a polynomial function over the standard simplex, and we provide a discrete-time high-order replicator dynamics to perform this optimization, based on the Baum-Eagon inequality. Experiments over synthetic as well as real-world data are presented which show the superiority of our approach over the state of the art." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.226" (20681 64083 859856) new 8 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: A Game-Theoretic Approach to Hypergraph Clustering") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.226") (description nil "Hypergraph clustering refers to the process of extracting maximally coherent groups from a set of objects using high-order (rather than pairwise) similarities. Traditional approaches to this problem are based on the idea of partitioning the input data into a predetermined number of classes, thereby obtaining the clusters as a by-product of the partitioning process. In this paper, we offer a radically different view of the problem. In contrast to the classical approach, we attempt to provide a meaningful formalization of the very notion of a cluster and we show that game theory offers an attractive and unexplored perspective that serves well our purpose. To this end, we formulate the hypergraph clustering problem in terms of a non-cooperative multi-player \"clustering game,\" and show that a natural notion of a cluster turns out to be equivalent to a classical (evolutionary) game-theoretic equilibrium concept. We prove that the problem of finding the equilibria of our clustering game is equivalent to locally optimizing a polynomial function over the standard simplex, and we provide a discrete-time high-order replicator dynamics to perform this optimization, based on the Baum-Eagon inequality. Experiments over synthetic as well as real-world data are presented which show the superiority of our approach over the state of the art.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.226"))) ("PrePrint: Robust Extrema Features for Time-Series Data Analysis" "The extraction of robust features for comparing and analyzing time-series is a fundamentally important problem. Research efforts in this area encompass dimensionality reduction using popular signal analysis tools such as the discrete Fourier and wavelet transforms, various distance metrics, and the extraction of interest points from time-series. Recently, extrema features for analysis of time-series data have assumed increasing significance because of their natural robustness under a variety of practical distortions, their economy of representation and computational benefits. Invariably, the process of encoding extrema features is preceded by filtering of the time-series with an intuitively motivated filter, and subsequent thresholding to identify robust extrema. We define the properties of robustness, uniqueness and cardinality as a means to identify the design choices available in each step of the feature generation process. Unlike existing methods which utilize filters \"inspired\" from either domain knowledge or intuition, we explicitly optimize the filter based on training time-series to optimize robustness of the extracted extrema features. We demonstrate further that the underlying filter optimization problem reduces to an eigenvalue problem and has a tractable solution. An encoding technique that enhances the control over cardinality and uniqueness is also presented. Experimental results obtained for the problem of time series subsequence matching establish the merits of the proposed algorithm." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.216" (20681 64083 859856) new 9 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Robust Extrema Features for Time-Series Data Analysis") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.216") (description nil "The extraction of robust features for comparing and analyzing time-series is a fundamentally important problem. Research efforts in this area encompass dimensionality reduction using popular signal analysis tools such as the discrete Fourier and wavelet transforms, various distance metrics, and the extraction of interest points from time-series. Recently, extrema features for analysis of time-series data have assumed increasing significance because of their natural robustness under a variety of practical distortions, their economy of representation and computational benefits. Invariably, the process of encoding extrema features is preceded by filtering of the time-series with an intuitively motivated filter, and subsequent thresholding to identify robust extrema. We define the properties of robustness, uniqueness and cardinality as a means to identify the design choices available in each step of the feature generation process. Unlike existing methods which utilize filters \"inspired\" from either domain knowledge or intuition, we explicitly optimize the filter based on training time-series to optimize robustness of the extracted extrema features. We demonstrate further that the underlying filter optimization problem reduces to an eigenvalue problem and has a tractable solution. An encoding technique that enhances the control over cardinality and uniqueness is also presented. Experimental results obtained for the problem of time series subsequence matching establish the merits of the proposed algorithm.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.216"))) ("PrePrint: Numerical Conditioning Problems and Solutions for Nonparametric i.i.d. Statistical Active Contours" "In this paper, we propose an active contour model based on non-parametric independent and identically distributed (i.i.d.) statistics of the image that can segment an image without any apriori information about the intensity distributions of the region of interest or the background. This is not, however, the first active contour model proposed to solve the segmentation problem under these same assumptions. In contrast to prior active contour models based on nonparametric i.i.d. statistics, we do not formulate our optimization criterion according to any distance measure between estimated probability densities inside and outside the active contour. Instead, treating the segmentation problem as a pixel-wise classification problem, we formulate an active contour to minimize the unbiased pixel-wise Average Misclassification Probability (AMP). This not only simplifies the problem by avoiding the need to arbitrarily select among many sensible distance measures to measure the difference between the probability densities estimated inside and outside the active contour, but it also solves a numerical conditioning problem that arises with such prior active contour models. As a result, the AMP model exhibits faster convergence with higher accuracy and robustness when compared to active contour models previously formulated to solve the same non-parametric i.i.d. statistical segmentation problem via probability distances." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.207" (20681 64083 859856) new 10 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Numerical Conditioning Problems and Solutions for Nonparametric i.i.d. Statistical Active Contours") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.207") (description nil "In this paper, we propose an active contour model based on non-parametric independent and identically distributed (i.i.d.) statistics of the image that can segment an image without any apriori information about the intensity distributions of the region of interest or the background. This is not, however, the first active contour model proposed to solve the segmentation problem under these same assumptions. In contrast to prior active contour models based on nonparametric i.i.d. statistics, we do not formulate our optimization criterion according to any distance measure between estimated probability densities inside and outside the active contour. Instead, treating the segmentation problem as a pixel-wise classification problem, we formulate an active contour to minimize the unbiased pixel-wise Average Misclassification Probability (AMP). This not only simplifies the problem by avoiding the need to arbitrarily select among many sensible distance measures to measure the difference between the probability densities estimated inside and outside the active contour, but it also solves a numerical conditioning problem that arises with such prior active contour models. As a result, the AMP model exhibits faster convergence with higher accuracy and robustness when compared to active contour models previously formulated to solve the same non-parametric i.i.d. statistical segmentation problem via probability distances.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.207"))) ("PrePrint: Local Evidence Aggregation for Regression Based Facial Point Detection" "We propose a new algorithm to detect facial points in frontal and near-frontal face images. It combines a regression-based approach with a probabilistic graphical model-based face shape model, that restricts the search to anthropomorphically consistent regions. While most regression-based approaches perform a sequential approximation of the target location, our algorithm detects the target location by aggregating the estimates obtained from stochastically selected local appearance information into a single robust prediction. The underlying assumption is that by aggregating the different estimates, their errors will cancel out as long as the regressor inputs are uncorrelated. Once this new perspective is adopted, the problem is reformulated as how to optimally select the test locations over which the regressors are evaluated. We propose to extend the regression-based model to provide a quality measure of each prediction, and use the shape model to restrict and correct the sampling region. Our approach combines the low computational cost typical of regression-based approaches with the robustness of exhaustive-search approaches. The proposed algorithm was tested on over 7,500 images from 5 databases. Results showed significant improvement over the current state of the art." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.205" (20681 64083 859856) new 11 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Local Evidence Aggregation for Regression Based Facial Point Detection") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.205") (description nil "We propose a new algorithm to detect facial points in frontal and near-frontal face images. It combines a regression-based approach with a probabilistic graphical model-based face shape model, that restricts the search to anthropomorphically consistent regions. While most regression-based approaches perform a sequential approximation of the target location, our algorithm detects the target location by aggregating the estimates obtained from stochastically selected local appearance information into a single robust prediction. The underlying assumption is that by aggregating the different estimates, their errors will cancel out as long as the regressor inputs are uncorrelated. Once this new perspective is adopted, the problem is reformulated as how to optimally select the test locations over which the regressors are evaluated. We propose to extend the regression-based model to provide a quality measure of each prediction, and use the shape model to restrict and correct the sampling region. Our approach combines the low computational cost typical of regression-based approaches with the robustness of exhaustive-search approaches. The proposed algorithm was tested on over 7,500 images from 5 databases. Results showed significant improvement over the current state of the art.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.205"))) ("PrePrint: A Convex Formulation for Learning a Shared Predictive Structure from Multiple Tasks" "In this paper, we consider the problem of learning from multiple related tasks for improved generalization performance by extracting their shared structures. The alternating structure optimization (ASO) algorithm which couples all tasks using a shared feature representation has been applied successfully in various multi-task learning problems. However, ASO is nonconvex and the alternating algorithm only finds a local solution. We first present an improved ASO formulation (iASO) for multitask learning based on a new regularizer. We then convert iASO, a non-convex formulation, into a relaxed convex one (rASO). Interestingly, our theoretical analysis reveals that rASO finds a globally optimal solution to its non-convex counterpart iASO under certain conditions. rASO can be equivalently reformulated as a semidefinite program (SDP), which is, however, not scalable to large datasets. We propose to employ the block coordinate descent (BCD) method and the accelerated projected gradient (APG) algorithm separately to find the globally optimal solution to rASO; we also develop efficient algorithms for solving the key subproblems involved in BCD and APG. The experiments on the Yahoo web pages datasets and the Drosophila gene expression pttern images datasets demonstrate the effectiveness and efficiency of the proposed algorithms and confirm our theoretical analysis." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.189" (20681 64083 859856) new 12 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: A Convex Formulation for Learning a Shared Predictive Structure from Multiple Tasks") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.189") (description nil "In this paper, we consider the problem of learning from multiple related tasks for improved generalization performance by extracting their shared structures. The alternating structure optimization (ASO) algorithm which couples all tasks using a shared feature representation has been applied successfully in various multi-task learning problems. However, ASO is nonconvex and the alternating algorithm only finds a local solution. We first present an improved ASO formulation (iASO) for multitask learning based on a new regularizer. We then convert iASO, a non-convex formulation, into a relaxed convex one (rASO). Interestingly, our theoretical analysis reveals that rASO finds a globally optimal solution to its non-convex counterpart iASO under certain conditions. rASO can be equivalently reformulated as a semidefinite program (SDP), which is, however, not scalable to large datasets. We propose to employ the block coordinate descent (BCD) method and the accelerated projected gradient (APG) algorithm separately to find the globally optimal solution to rASO; we also develop efficient algorithms for solving the key subproblems involved in BCD and APG. The experiments on the Yahoo web pages datasets and the Drosophila gene expression pttern images datasets demonstrate the effectiveness and efficiency of the proposed algorithms and confirm our theoretical analysis.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.189"))) ("PrePrint: Online Feature Selection with Streaming Features" "We propose a new online feature selection framework for applications with streaming features where features are supplied continuously and the knowledge of the full feature space is unknown in advance. We define streaming features as features that flow one by one over time although the number of training examples remains fixed. This is in contrast with traditional online learning methods that only deal with sequentially added observations, with little attention being paid to streaming features. The critical challenges for online streaming feature selection include: (1) the continuous growth of feature volumes over time; (2) a very large feature space, possibly of unknown or infinite size; and (3) the unavailability of all features before feature selection starts. In the paper, we present a novel Online Streaming Feature Selection (OSFS) method to select strongly relevant and non-redundant features on the fly. An efficient Fast-OSFS algorithm is proposed to improve feature selection performance. The proposed algorithms are evaluated extensively on high-dimensional datasets and also with a real-world case study on impact crater detection. Experimental results demonstrate that the algorithms achieve better compactness and higher accuracy than existing streaming feature selection algorithms." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.197" (20681 64083 859856) new 13 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Online Feature Selection with Streaming Features") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.197") (description nil "We propose a new online feature selection framework for applications with streaming features where features are supplied continuously and the knowledge of the full feature space is unknown in advance. We define streaming features as features that flow one by one over time although the number of training examples remains fixed. This is in contrast with traditional online learning methods that only deal with sequentially added observations, with little attention being paid to streaming features. The critical challenges for online streaming feature selection include: (1) the continuous growth of feature volumes over time; (2) a very large feature space, possibly of unknown or infinite size; and (3) the unavailability of all features before feature selection starts. In the paper, we present a novel Online Streaming Feature Selection (OSFS) method to select strongly relevant and non-redundant features on the fly. An efficient Fast-OSFS algorithm is proposed to improve feature selection performance. The proposed algorithms are evaluated extensively on high-dimensional datasets and also with a real-world case study on impact crater detection. Experimental results demonstrate that the algorithms achieve better compactness and higher accuracy than existing streaming feature selection algorithms.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.197"))) ("PrePrint: Iterative Quantization: A Procrustean Approach to Learning Binary Codes for Large-scale Image Retrieval" "This paper addresses the problem of learning similarity-preserving binary codes for efficient similarity search in large-scale image collections. We formulate this problem in terms of finding a rotation of zero-centered data so as to minimize the quantization error of mapping this data to the vertices of a zero-centered binary hypercube, and propose a simple and efficient alternating minimization algorithm to accomplish this task. This algorithm, dubbed iterative quantization (ITQ), has connections to multi-class spectral clustering and to the orthogonal Procrustes problem, and it can be used both with unsupervised data embeddings such as PCA and supervised embeddings such as canonical correlation analysis (CCA). The resulting binary codes significantly outperform several other state-of-the-art methods. We also show that further performance improvements can result from transforming the data with a nonlinear kernel mapping prior to PCA or CCA. Finally, we demonstrate an application of ITQ to learning binary attributes or \"classemes\" on the ImageNet dataset." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.193" (20681 64083 859856) new 14 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Iterative Quantization: A Procrustean Approach to Learning Binary Codes for Large-scale Image Retrieval") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.193") (description nil "This paper addresses the problem of learning similarity-preserving binary codes for efficient similarity search in large-scale image collections. We formulate this problem in terms of finding a rotation of zero-centered data so as to minimize the quantization error of mapping this data to the vertices of a zero-centered binary hypercube, and propose a simple and efficient alternating minimization algorithm to accomplish this task. This algorithm, dubbed iterative quantization (ITQ), has connections to multi-class spectral clustering and to the orthogonal Procrustes problem, and it can be used both with unsupervised data embeddings such as PCA and supervised embeddings such as canonical correlation analysis (CCA). The resulting binary codes significantly outperform several other state-of-the-art methods. We also show that further performance improvements can result from transforming the data with a nonlinear kernel mapping prior to PCA or CCA. Finally, we demonstrate an application of ITQ to learning binary attributes or \"classemes\" on the ImageNet dataset.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.193"))) ("PrePrint: Multiple Target Tracking by Learning Based Hierarchical Association of Detection Responses" "We propose a learning-based hierarchical association approach to multiple target tracking from a single camera by progressively linking detection responses into longer track fragments (i.e., tracklets). This approach consists of two key components: a hierarchical association framework and a novel learn method for tracklet affinity models. The association of tracklets at each level of the hierarchy is formulated as a Maximum A Posteriori (MAP) problem that can be efficiently resolved by the Hungarian algorithm; the learning of tracklet affinity models is converted into a bag ranking problem so that a set of weak affinity models upon various features can be combined together to achieve satisfactory accuracy. The experiments conducted on two challenging data sets (CAVIAR and TRECVID08) show that our proposed approach achieves compelling accuracy of tracking multiple inter-occluded targets in crowded environments." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.159" (20681 64083 859856) new 15 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Multiple Target Tracking by Learning Based Hierarchical Association of Detection Responses") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.159") (description nil "We propose a learning-based hierarchical association approach to multiple target tracking from a single camera by progressively linking detection responses into longer track fragments (i.e., tracklets). This approach consists of two key components: a hierarchical association framework and a novel learn method for tracklet affinity models. The association of tracklets at each level of the hierarchy is formulated as a Maximum A Posteriori (MAP) problem that can be efficiently resolved by the Hungarian algorithm; the learning of tracklet affinity models is converted into a bag ranking problem so that a set of weak affinity models upon various features can be combined together to achieve satisfactory accuracy. The experiments conducted on two challenging data sets (CAVIAR and TRECVID08) show that our proposed approach achieves compelling accuracy of tracking multiple inter-occluded targets in crowded environments.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.159"))) ("PrePrint: 3D Stochastic Completion Fields for Mapping Connectivity in Diffusion MRI" "The 2D stochastic completion field algorithm, introduced by Williams and Jacobs [1], [2], uses a directional random walk to model the prior probability of completion curves in the plane. This construct has had a powerful impact in computer vision, where it has been used to compute the shapes of likely completion curves between edge fragments in visual imagery. Motivated by these developments we extend the algorithm to 3D, using a spherical harmonics basis to achieve a rotation invariant computational solution to the Fokker-Planck equation describing the evolution of the probability density function underlying the model. This provides a principled way to compute 3D completion patterns and to derive connectivity measures for orientation data in 3D, as arises in 3D tracking, motion capture and medical imaging. We demonstrate the utility of the approach for the particular case of diffusion magnetic resonance imaging, where we derive connectivity maps for synthetic data, on a physical phantom and on an in vivo high angular resolution diffusion image of a human brain." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.184" (20681 64083 859856) new 16 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: 3D Stochastic Completion Fields for Mapping Connectivity in Diffusion MRI") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.184") (description nil "The 2D stochastic completion field algorithm, introduced by Williams and Jacobs [1], [2], uses a directional random walk to model the prior probability of completion curves in the plane. This construct has had a powerful impact in computer vision, where it has been used to compute the shapes of likely completion curves between edge fragments in visual imagery. Motivated by these developments we extend the algorithm to 3D, using a spherical harmonics basis to achieve a rotation invariant computational solution to the Fokker-Planck equation describing the evolution of the probability density function underlying the model. This provides a principled way to compute 3D completion patterns and to derive connectivity measures for orientation data in 3D, as arises in 3D tracking, motion capture and medical imaging. We demonstrate the utility of the approach for the particular case of diffusion magnetic resonance imaging, where we derive connectivity maps for synthetic data, on a physical phantom and on an in vivo high angular resolution diffusion image of a human brain.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.184"))) ("PrePrint: A Prototype Learning Framework using EMD: Application to Complex Scenes Analysis" "In the last decades, many efforts have been devoted to develop methods for automatic scene understanding in the context of video surveillance applications. This paper presents a novel non-object centric approach for complex scene analysis. Similarly to previous methods, we use low-level cues to individuate atomic activities and create clip histograms. Differently from recent works, the task of discovering high-level activity patterns is formulated as a convex prototype learning problem. This problem results into a simple linear program that can be solved efficiently with standard solvers. The main advantage of our approach is that, using as objective function the Earth Mover's Distance (EMD), the similarity among elementary activities is taken into account in the learning phase. To improve scalability we also consider some variants of EMD adopting L1 as ground distance for one and two dimensional, linear and circular histograms. As in these cases only the similarity between neighboring atomic activities is taken into account, we also propose an automatic strategy for sorting them. Experimental results on publicly available datasets show that our method compares favorably with state-of-the-art approaches, often outperforming them." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.131" (20681 64083 859856) new 17 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: A Prototype Learning Framework using EMD: Application to Complex Scenes Analysis") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.131") (description nil "In the last decades, many efforts have been devoted to develop methods for automatic scene understanding in the context of video surveillance applications. This paper presents a novel non-object centric approach for complex scene analysis. Similarly to previous methods, we use low-level cues to individuate atomic activities and create clip histograms. Differently from recent works, the task of discovering high-level activity patterns is formulated as a convex prototype learning problem. This problem results into a simple linear program that can be solved efficiently with standard solvers. The main advantage of our approach is that, using as objective function the Earth Mover's Distance (EMD), the similarity among elementary activities is taken into account in the learning phase. To improve scalability we also consider some variants of EMD adopting L1 as ground distance for one and two dimensional, linear and circular histograms. As in these cases only the similarity between neighboring atomic activities is taken into account, we also propose an automatic strategy for sorting them. Experimental results on publicly available datasets show that our method compares favorably with state-of-the-art approaches, often outperforming them.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.131"))) ("PrePrint: Monocular Visual Scene Understanding: Understanding Multi-Object Traffic Scenes" "Following recent advances in detection, context modeling and tracking, scene understanding has been the focus of renewed interest in computer vision research. This paper presents a novel probabilistic 3D scene model that integrates state-of-the-art multi-class object detection, object tracking and scene labeling together with geometric 3D reasoning. Our model is able to represent complex object interactions such as inter-object occlusion, physical exclusion between objects, and geometric context. Inference in this model allows to jointly recover the 3D scene context and perform 3D multi-object tracking from a mobile observer, for objects of multiple categories, using only monocular video as input. Contrary to many other approaches our system performs explicit occlusion reasoning and is therefore capable of tracking objects that are partially occluded for extended periods of time, or objects that have never been observed to their full extent. In addition, we show that a joint scene tracklet model for the evidence collected over multiple frames substantially improves performance. The approach is evaluated for different types of challenging onboard sequences. We first show a substantial improvement to the state-of-the-art in 3D multi-people tracking. Moreover, a similar performance gain is achieved for multi-class 3D tracking of cars and trucks on a challenging dataset." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.174" (20681 64083 859856) new 18 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Monocular Visual Scene Understanding: Understanding Multi-Object Traffic Scenes") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.174") (description nil "Following recent advances in detection, context modeling and tracking, scene understanding has been the focus of renewed interest in computer vision research. This paper presents a novel probabilistic 3D scene model that integrates state-of-the-art multi-class object detection, object tracking and scene labeling together with geometric 3D reasoning. Our model is able to represent complex object interactions such as inter-object occlusion, physical exclusion between objects, and geometric context. Inference in this model allows to jointly recover the 3D scene context and perform 3D multi-object tracking from a mobile observer, for objects of multiple categories, using only monocular video as input. Contrary to many other approaches our system performs explicit occlusion reasoning and is therefore capable of tracking objects that are partially occluded for extended periods of time, or objects that have never been observed to their full extent. In addition, we show that a joint scene tracklet model for the evidence collected over multiple frames substantially improves performance. The approach is evaluated for different types of challenging onboard sequences. We first show a substantial improvement to the state-of-the-art in 3D multi-people tracking. Moreover, a similar performance gain is achieved for multi-class 3D tracking of cars and trucks on a challenging dataset.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.174"))) ("PrePrint: Optimizing Non-Decomposable Loss Functions in Structured Prediction" "We develop an algorithm for structured prediction with non-decomposable performance measures. The algorithm learns parameters of Markov random fields and can be applied to multivariate performance measures. Examples include performance measures such as F_\\beta score (natural language processing), intersection over union (object category segmentation), Precision/Recall at k (search engines) and ROC area (binary classifiers). We attack this optimization problem by approximating the loss function with a piecewise linear function. The loss augmented inference forms a quadratic program (QP), which we solve using LP relaxation. We apply this approach to two tasks: object class-specific segmentation and human action retrieval from videos. We show significant improvement over baseline approaches that either use simple loss functions or simple scoring functions on the PASCAL VOC and H3D Segmentation datasets, and a nursing home action recognition dataset." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.168" (20681 64083 859856) new 19 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Optimizing Non-Decomposable Loss Functions in Structured Prediction") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.168") (description nil "We develop an algorithm for structured prediction with non-decomposable performance measures. The algorithm learns parameters of Markov random fields and can be applied to multivariate performance measures. Examples include performance measures such as F_\\beta score (natural language processing), intersection over union (object category segmentation), Precision/Recall at k (search engines) and ROC area (binary classifiers). We attack this optimization problem by approximating the loss function with a piecewise linear function. The loss augmented inference forms a quadratic program (QP), which we solve using LP relaxation. We apply this approach to two tasks: object class-specific segmentation and human action retrieval from videos. We show significant improvement over baseline approaches that either use simple loss functions or simple scoring functions on the PASCAL VOC and H3D Segmentation datasets, and a nursing home action recognition dataset.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.168"))) ("PrePrint: Comparative Analysis and Fusion of Spatio-Temporal Information for Footstep Recognition" "Footstep recognition is a relatively new biometric, which aims to discriminate persons using walking characteristics extracted from floor-based sensors. This paper reports for the first time a comparative assessment of the spatio-temporal information contained in the footstep signals for person recognition. Experiments are carried out on the largest footstep database collected to date, with almost 20,000 valid footstep signals and more than 120 persons. Results show very similar performance for both spatial and temporal approaches (5% to 15% EER depending on the experimental setup), and a significant improvement is achieved for their fusion (2.5% to 10% EER). The assessment protocol is focused on the influence of the quantity of data used in the reference models, which serves to simulate conditions of different potential applications such as smart homes or security access scenarios." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.164" (20681 64083 859856) new 20 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Comparative Analysis and Fusion of Spatio-Temporal Information for Footstep Recognition") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.164") (description nil "Footstep recognition is a relatively new biometric, which aims to discriminate persons using walking characteristics extracted from floor-based sensors. This paper reports for the first time a comparative assessment of the spatio-temporal information contained in the footstep signals for person recognition. Experiments are carried out on the largest footstep database collected to date, with almost 20,000 valid footstep signals and more than 120 persons. Results show very similar performance for both spatial and temporal approaches (5% to 15% EER depending on the experimental setup), and a significant improvement is achieved for their fusion (2.5% to 10% EER). The assessment protocol is focused on the influence of the quantity of data used in the reference models, which serves to simulate conditions of different potential applications such as smart homes or security access scenarios.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.164"))) ("PrePrint: Fast Cost-Volume Filtering for Visual Correspondence and Beyond" "Many computer vision tasks can be formulated as labeling problems. The desired solution is often a spatially smooth labeling where label transitions are aligned with color edges of the input image. We show that such solutions can be efficiently achieved by smoothing the label costs with a very fast edge-preserving filter. In this paper we propose a generic and simple framework comprising three steps: (i) Constructing a cost volume; (ii) Fast cost volume filtering; and (iii) Winner-Takes-All label selection. Our main contribution is to show that with such a simple framework state-of-the-art results can be achieved for several computer vision applications. In particular, we achieve (i) disparity maps in real-time, whose quality exceeds those of all other fast (local) approaches on the Middlebury stereo benchmark, and (ii) optical flow fields which contain very fine structures as well as large displacements. To demonstrate robustness, the few parameters of our framework are set to nearly identical values for both applications. Also, competitive results for interactive image segmentation are presented. With this work, we hope to inspire other researchers to leverage this framework to other application areas." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.156" (20681 64083 859856) new 21 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Fast Cost-Volume Filtering for Visual Correspondence and Beyond") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.156") (description nil "Many computer vision tasks can be formulated as labeling problems. The desired solution is often a spatially smooth labeling where label transitions are aligned with color edges of the input image. We show that such solutions can be efficiently achieved by smoothing the label costs with a very fast edge-preserving filter. In this paper we propose a generic and simple framework comprising three steps: (i) Constructing a cost volume; (ii) Fast cost volume filtering; and (iii) Winner-Takes-All label selection. Our main contribution is to show that with such a simple framework state-of-the-art results can be achieved for several computer vision applications. In particular, we achieve (i) disparity maps in real-time, whose quality exceeds those of all other fast (local) approaches on the Middlebury stereo benchmark, and (ii) optical flow fields which contain very fine structures as well as large displacements. To demonstrate robustness, the few parameters of our framework are set to nearly identical values for both applications. Also, competitive results for interactive image segmentation are presented. With this work, we hope to inspire other researchers to leverage this framework to other application areas.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.156"))) ("PrePrint: Robust Visual Tracking using an Adaptive Coupled-layer Visual Model" "This paper addresses the problem of tracking objects which undergo rapid and significant appearance changes. We propose a novel coupled-layer visual model that combines the target's global and local appearance by interlacing two layers. The local layer in this model is a set of local patches that geometrically constrain the changes in the target's appearance. This layer probabilistically adapts to the target's geometric deformation, while its structure is updated by removing and adding the local patches. The addition of these patches is constrained by the global layer that probabilistically models target's global visual properties such as color, shape and apparent local motion. The global visual properties are updated during tracking using the stable patches from the local layer. By this coupled constraint paradigm between the adaptation of the global and the local layer, we achieve a more robust tracking through significant appearance changes. We experimentally compare our tracker to eleven state-of-the-art trackers. The experimental results on challenging sequences confirm that our tracker outperforms the related trackers in many cases by having smaller failure rate as well as better accuracy. Furthermore, the parameter analysis shows that our tracker is stable over a range of parameter values." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.145" (20681 64083 859856) new 22 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Robust Visual Tracking using an Adaptive Coupled-layer Visual Model") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.145") (description nil "This paper addresses the problem of tracking objects which undergo rapid and significant appearance changes. We propose a novel coupled-layer visual model that combines the target's global and local appearance by interlacing two layers. The local layer in this model is a set of local patches that geometrically constrain the changes in the target's appearance. This layer probabilistically adapts to the target's geometric deformation, while its structure is updated by removing and adding the local patches. The addition of these patches is constrained by the global layer that probabilistically models target's global visual properties such as color, shape and apparent local motion. The global visual properties are updated during tracking using the stable patches from the local layer. By this coupled constraint paradigm between the adaptation of the global and the local layer, we achieve a more robust tracking through significant appearance changes. We experimentally compare our tracker to eleven state-of-the-art trackers. The experimental results on challenging sequences confirm that our tracker outperforms the related trackers in many cases by having smaller failure rate as well as better accuracy. Furthermore, the parameter analysis shows that our tracker is stable over a range of parameter values.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.145"))) ("PrePrint: A Globally-Variant Locally-Constant Model for Fusion of Labels from Multiple Diverse Experts Without Using Reference Labels" "It has been shown that fusion of categorical labels from multiple experts - humans or machine classifiers - improves the accuracy and generalizability of the overall classification system. Simple plurality is a popular technique for performing this fusion, but it gives equal importance to labels from all experts who may not be equally reliable and consistent across the data set. Estimation of expert reliability without knowing the reference labels is however a challenging problem. Most previous works deal with these challenges by modeling expert reliability as constant over the entire data (feature) space. This paper presents a model based on the consideration that in dealing with real-world data, expert reliability is variable over the complete feature space but constant over local clusters of homogeneous instances. This model jointly learns a classifier and expert reliability parameters without assuming the knowledge of reference labels using the Expectation-Maximization algorithm. Classification experiments on simulated data, data from the UCI Machine Learning Repository and two emotional speech classification datasets show the benefits of the proposed model. Using a metric based on the Jensen-Shannon divergence, we empirically show that the proposed model gives greater benefit for data sets where expert reliability is highly variable over the feature space." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.139" (20681 64083 859856) new 23 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: A Globally-Variant Locally-Constant Model for Fusion of Labels from Multiple Diverse Experts Without Using Reference Labels") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.139") (description nil "It has been shown that fusion of categorical labels from multiple experts - humans or machine classifiers - improves the accuracy and generalizability of the overall classification system. Simple plurality is a popular technique for performing this fusion, but it gives equal importance to labels from all experts who may not be equally reliable and consistent across the data set. Estimation of expert reliability without knowing the reference labels is however a challenging problem. Most previous works deal with these challenges by modeling expert reliability as constant over the entire data (feature) space. This paper presents a model based on the consideration that in dealing with real-world data, expert reliability is variable over the complete feature space but constant over local clusters of homogeneous instances. This model jointly learns a classifier and expert reliability parameters without assuming the knowledge of reference labels using the Expectation-Maximization algorithm. Classification experiments on simulated data, data from the UCI Machine Learning Repository and two emotional speech classification datasets show the benefits of the proposed model. Using a metric based on the Jensen-Shannon divergence, we empirically show that the proposed model gives greater benefit for data sets where expert reliability is highly variable over the feature space.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.139"))) ("PrePrint: Recognition using Specular Highlights" "We present a novel approach to pose estimation and model-based recognition of specular objects in difficult viewing conditions, such as low illumination, cluttered background, and large highlights and shadows that appear on the object of interest. In such challenging conditions conventional features are unreliable. We show that under the assumption of a dominant light source, specular highlights produced by a known object can be used to establish correspondence between its image and the 3D model, and to verify the hypothesized pose and the identity of the object. Previous methods that use highlights for recognition make limiting assumptions such as known pose, scene-dependent calibration, simple shape, etc. The proposed method can efficiently recognize free form specular objects in arbitrary pose and under unknown lighting direction. It uses only a single image of the object as its input and outputs object identity and the full pose. We have performed extensive experiments for both recognition and pose estimation accuracy, on synthetic images and on real indoor and outdoor images." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.127" (20681 64083 859856) new 24 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Recognition using Specular Highlights") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.127") (description nil "We present a novel approach to pose estimation and model-based recognition of specular objects in difficult viewing conditions, such as low illumination, cluttered background, and large highlights and shadows that appear on the object of interest. In such challenging conditions conventional features are unreliable. We show that under the assumption of a dominant light source, specular highlights produced by a known object can be used to establish correspondence between its image and the 3D model, and to verify the hypothesized pose and the identity of the object. Previous methods that use highlights for recognition make limiting assumptions such as known pose, scene-dependent calibration, simple shape, etc. The proposed method can efficiently recognize free form specular objects in arbitrary pose and under unknown lighting direction. It uses only a single image of the object as its input and outputs object identity and the full pose. We have performed extensive experiments for both recognition and pose estimation accuracy, on synthetic images and on real indoor and outdoor images.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.127"))) ("PrePrint: Automatic Caption Generation for News Images" "This paper is concerned with the task of automatically generating captions for images, which is important for many image-related applications. Our approach leverages the vast resource of pictures available on the web and the fact that many of them are captioned and co-located with thematically related documents. Our model learns to create captions from a database of news articles, the pictures embedded in them, and their captions and consists of two stages. Content selection identifies what the image and accompanying article are about, whereas surface realization determines how to verbalize the chosen content. We approximate content selection with a probabilistic image annotation model that suggests keywords for an image. The model postulates that images and their textual descriptions are generated by a shared set of latent variables (topics), and is trained on a weakly-labeled dataset (which treats the captions and associated news articles as image labels). Inspired by recent work in summarization, we propose extractive and abstractive surface realization models. Experimental results show that it is viable to generate captions that are pertinent to the specific content of an image and its associated article, while permitting creativity in the description. Indeed, the output of our abstractive model compares favorably to hand-written captions and is often superior to extractive methods." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.118" (20681 64083 859856) new 25 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Automatic Caption Generation for News Images") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.118") (description nil "This paper is concerned with the task of automatically generating captions for images, which is important for many image-related applications. Our approach leverages the vast resource of pictures available on the web and the fact that many of them are captioned and co-located with thematically related documents. Our model learns to create captions from a database of news articles, the pictures embedded in them, and their captions and consists of two stages. Content selection identifies what the image and accompanying article are about, whereas surface realization determines how to verbalize the chosen content. We approximate content selection with a probabilistic image annotation model that suggests keywords for an image. The model postulates that images and their textual descriptions are generated by a shared set of latent variables (topics), and is trained on a weakly-labeled dataset (which treats the captions and associated news articles as image labels). Inspired by recent work in summarization, we propose extractive and abstractive surface realization models. Experimental results show that it is viable to generate captions that are pertinent to the specific content of an image and its associated article, while permitting creativity in the description. Indeed, the output of our abstractive model compares favorably to hand-written captions and is often superior to extractive methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.118"))) ("PrePrint: Robust Simultaneous Registration and Segmentation with Sparse Error Reconstruction" "We introduce a fast and efficient variational framework for simultaneous registration and segmentation applicable to a wide variety of image sequences. We demonstrate that a dense correspondence map (between consecutive frames) can be reconstructed correctly even in the presence of partial occlusion, shading and reflections. The errors are efficiently handled by exploiting their sparse nature. In addition, the segmentation functional is reformulated using a dual Rudin-Osher-Fatemi (ROF) model for fast implementation. Moreover, non-parametric shape prior terms that are suited for this dual-ROF model are proposed. The efficacy of the proposed method is validated with extensive experiments on both indoor, outdoor natural and biological image sequences demonstrating the higher accuracy and efficiency compared to various state-of-the-art methods." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.103" (20681 64083 859856) new 26 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Robust Simultaneous Registration and Segmentation with Sparse Error Reconstruction") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.103") (description nil "We introduce a fast and efficient variational framework for simultaneous registration and segmentation applicable to a wide variety of image sequences. We demonstrate that a dense correspondence map (between consecutive frames) can be reconstructed correctly even in the presence of partial occlusion, shading and reflections. The errors are efficiently handled by exploiting their sparse nature. In addition, the segmentation functional is reformulated using a dual Rudin-Osher-Fatemi (ROF) model for fast implementation. Moreover, non-parametric shape prior terms that are suited for this dual-ROF model are proposed. The efficacy of the proposed method is validated with extensive experiments on both indoor, outdoor natural and biological image sequences demonstrating the higher accuracy and efficiency compared to various state-of-the-art methods.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.103"))) ("PrePrint: Tree-structured CRF Models for Interactive Image Labeling" "We propose structured prediction models for image labeling that explicitly take into account dependencies among image labels. In our tree structured models, image labels are nodes, and edges encode dependency relations. To allow for more complex dependencies, we combine labels in a single node, and use mixtures of trees. Our models are more expressive than independent predictors, and lead to more accurate label predictions. The gain becomes more significant in an interactive scenario where a user provides the value of some of the image labels at test time. Such an interactive scenario offers an interesting trade-off between label accuracy and manual labeling effort. The structured models are used to decide which labels should be set by the user, and transfer the user input to more accurate predictions on other image labels. We also apply our models to attribute-based image classification, where attribute predictions of a test image are mapped to class probabilities by means of a given attribute-class mapping. Experimental results on three publicly available benchmark data sets show that in all scenarios our structured models lead to more accurate predictions, and leverage user input much more effectively than state-of-the-art independent models." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.100" (20681 64083 859856) new 27 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Tree-structured CRF Models for Interactive Image Labeling") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.100") (description nil "We propose structured prediction models for image labeling that explicitly take into account dependencies among image labels. In our tree structured models, image labels are nodes, and edges encode dependency relations. To allow for more complex dependencies, we combine labels in a single node, and use mixtures of trees. Our models are more expressive than independent predictors, and lead to more accurate label predictions. The gain becomes more significant in an interactive scenario where a user provides the value of some of the image labels at test time. Such an interactive scenario offers an interesting trade-off between label accuracy and manual labeling effort. The structured models are used to decide which labels should be set by the user, and transfer the user input to more accurate predictions on other image labels. We also apply our models to attribute-based image classification, where attribute predictions of a test image are mapped to class probabilities by means of a given attribute-class mapping. Experimental results on three publicly available benchmark data sets show that in all scenarios our structured models lead to more accurate predictions, and leverage user input much more effectively than state-of-the-art independent models.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.100"))) ("PrePrint: Characterizing Humans on Riemannian Manifolds" "In surveillance applications, head and body orientation of people is of primary importance for assessing many behavioural traits. Unfortunately, in this context people is often encoded by few, noisy pixels, so that their characterization is difficult. We face this issue, proposing a computational framework which is based on an expressive descriptor, the covariance of features. Covariances have been employed for pedestrian detection purposes, actually, a binary classification problem on Riemannian manifolds. In this paper, we show how to extend to the multi-classification case, presenting a novel descriptor, named Weighted ARray of COvariances, WARCO, especially suited for dealing with tiny image representations. The extension requires a novel differential geometry approach, in which covariances are projected on a unique tangent space, where standard machine learning techniques can be applied. In particular, we adopt the Campbell-Baker-Hausdorff expansion as a means to approximate on the tangent space the genuine (geodesic) distances on the manifold, in a very efficient way. We test our methodology on multiple benchmark datasets, and also propose new testing sets, getting convincing results in all the cases." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.263" (20681 64083 859856) new 28 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Characterizing Humans on Riemannian Manifolds") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.263") (description nil "In surveillance applications, head and body orientation of people is of primary importance for assessing many behavioural traits. Unfortunately, in this context people is often encoded by few, noisy pixels, so that their characterization is difficult. We face this issue, proposing a computational framework which is based on an expressive descriptor, the covariance of features. Covariances have been employed for pedestrian detection purposes, actually, a binary classification problem on Riemannian manifolds. In this paper, we show how to extend to the multi-classification case, presenting a novel descriptor, named Weighted ARray of COvariances, WARCO, especially suited for dealing with tiny image representations. The extension requires a novel differential geometry approach, in which covariances are projected on a unique tangent space, where standard machine learning techniques can be applied. In particular, we adopt the Campbell-Baker-Hausdorff expansion as a means to approximate on the tangent space the genuine (geodesic) distances on the manifold, in a very efficient way. We test our methodology on multiple benchmark datasets, and also propose new testing sets, getting convincing results in all the cases.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.263"))) ("PrePrint: Hierarchical Object Parsing from Structured Noisy Point Clouds" "Object parsing and segmentation from point clouds are challenging tasks because the relevant data is available only as thin structures along object boundaries or other features, and is corrupted by large amounts of noise. To handle this kind of data, flexible shape models are desired that can accurately follow the object boundaries. Popular models such as Active Shape and Active Appearance models lack the necessary flexibility for this task, while recent approaches such as the Recursive Compositional Models make model simplifications in order to obtain computational guarantees. This paper investigates a hierarchical Bayesian model of shape and appearance in a generative setting. The input data is explained by an object parsing layer, which is a deformation of a hidden PCA shape model with Gaussian prior. The paper also introduces a novel efficient inference algorithm that uses informed data-driven proposals to initialize local searches for the hidden variables. Applied to the problem of object parsing from structured point clouds such as edge detection images, the proposed approach obtains state of the art parsing errors on two standard datasets without using any intensity information." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.262" (20681 64083 859856) new 29 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Hierarchical Object Parsing from Structured Noisy Point Clouds") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.262") (description nil "Object parsing and segmentation from point clouds are challenging tasks because the relevant data is available only as thin structures along object boundaries or other features, and is corrupted by large amounts of noise. To handle this kind of data, flexible shape models are desired that can accurately follow the object boundaries. Popular models such as Active Shape and Active Appearance models lack the necessary flexibility for this task, while recent approaches such as the Recursive Compositional Models make model simplifications in order to obtain computational guarantees. This paper investigates a hierarchical Bayesian model of shape and appearance in a generative setting. The input data is explained by an object parsing layer, which is a deformation of a hidden PCA shape model with Gaussian prior. The paper also introduces a novel efficient inference algorithm that uses informed data-driven proposals to initialize local searches for the hidden variables. Applied to the problem of object parsing from structured point clouds such as edge detection images, the proposed approach obtains state of the art parsing errors on two standard datasets without using any intensity information.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.262"))) ("PrePrint: Articulated Human Detection with Flexible Mixtures-of-Parts" "We describe a method for articulated human detection and human pose estimation in static images based on a new representation of deformable part models. Rather than modeling articulation using a family of warped (rotated and foreshortened) templates, we use a mixture of small, non-oriented parts. We describe a general, flexible mixture model that jointly captures spatial relations between part locations and co-occurence relations between part mixtures, augmenting standard pictorial structure models that encode just spatial relations. Our models have several notable properties: (1) they efficiently model articulation by sharing computation across similar warps (2) they efficiently model an exponentially-large set of global mixtures through composition of local mixtures and (3) they capture the dependency of global geometry on local appearance (parts look different at different locations). When relations are tree-structured, our models can be efficiently optimized with dynamic programming. We introduce novel criteria for evaluating pose estimation and human detection, both separately and jointly. We show that currently-used evaluation criteria may conflate these two issues. We present experimental results on standard benchmarks that suggest our approach is the state-of-the-art system for pose estimation, improving past work on the challenging Parse and Buffy datasets, while being orders of magnitude faster." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.261" (20681 64083 859856) new 30 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Articulated Human Detection with Flexible Mixtures-of-Parts") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.261") (description nil "We describe a method for articulated human detection and human pose estimation in static images based on a new representation of deformable part models. Rather than modeling articulation using a family of warped (rotated and foreshortened) templates, we use a mixture of small, non-oriented parts. We describe a general, flexible mixture model that jointly captures spatial relations between part locations and co-occurence relations between part mixtures, augmenting standard pictorial structure models that encode just spatial relations. Our models have several notable properties: (1) they efficiently model articulation by sharing computation across similar warps (2) they efficiently model an exponentially-large set of global mixtures through composition of local mixtures and (3) they capture the dependency of global geometry on local appearance (parts look different at different locations). When relations are tree-structured, our models can be efficiently optimized with dynamic programming. We introduce novel criteria for evaluating pose estimation and human detection, both separately and jointly. We show that currently-used evaluation criteria may conflate these two issues. We present experimental results on standard benchmarks that suggest our approach is the state-of-the-art system for pose estimation, improving past work on the challenging Parse and Buffy datasets, while being orders of magnitude faster.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.261"))) ("PrePrint: Joint Albedo Estimation and Pose Tracking from Video" "The albedo of a Lambertian object is a surface property that contributes to an object's appearance under changing illumination. As a signature independent of illumination, the albedo is useful for object recognition. Single image-based albedo estimation algorithms suffer due to shadows and non-Lambertian effects of the image. In this paper, we propose a sequential algorithm to estimate the albedo from a sequence of images of a known 3D object in varying poses and illumination conditions. We first show that by knowing/estimating the pose of the object at each frame of a sequence, the object's albedo can be efficiently estimated using a Kalman filter. We then extend this for the case of unknown pose by simultaneously tracking the pose as well as updating the albedo through a Rao-Blackwellized particle filter. More specifically, the albedo is marginalized from the posterior distribution and estimated analytically using the Kalman filter, while the pose parameters are estimated using importance sampling and by minimizing the projection error of the face onto its spherical harmonic subspace, which results in an illumination-insensitive pose tracking algorithm. Illustrations and experiments are provided to validate the effectiveness of the approach using various synthetic and real sequences followed by applications to unconstrained, video-based face recognition." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.249" (20681 64083 859856) new 31 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Joint Albedo Estimation and Pose Tracking from Video") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.249") (description nil "The albedo of a Lambertian object is a surface property that contributes to an object's appearance under changing illumination. As a signature independent of illumination, the albedo is useful for object recognition. Single image-based albedo estimation algorithms suffer due to shadows and non-Lambertian effects of the image. In this paper, we propose a sequential algorithm to estimate the albedo from a sequence of images of a known 3D object in varying poses and illumination conditions. We first show that by knowing/estimating the pose of the object at each frame of a sequence, the object's albedo can be efficiently estimated using a Kalman filter. We then extend this for the case of unknown pose by simultaneously tracking the pose as well as updating the albedo through a Rao-Blackwellized particle filter. More specifically, the albedo is marginalized from the posterior distribution and estimated analytically using the Kalman filter, while the pose parameters are estimated using importance sampling and by minimizing the projection error of the face onto its spherical harmonic subspace, which results in an illumination-insensitive pose tracking algorithm. Illustrations and experiments are provided to validate the effectiveness of the approach using various synthetic and real sequences followed by applications to unconstrained, video-based face recognition.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.249"))) ("PrePrint: USAC: A Universal Framework for Random Sample Consensus" "A computational problem that arises frequently in computer vision is that of estimating the parameters of a model from data that has been contaminated by noise and outliers. More generally, any practical system that seeks to estimate quantities from noisy data measurements must some means of dealing with data contamination. The Random Sample Consensus (RANSAC) algorithm is one of the most popular tools for robust estimation. Recent years have seen an explosion of activity in this area, leading to the development of a number of techniques that improve upon the efficiency and robustness of the basic algorithm. In this paper, we present a comprehensive overview of recent research in RANSAC-based robust estimation, by analyzing various approaches that have been explored over the years. We provide a common context for this analysis by introducing a new framework, which we call Universal RANSAC (USAC). USAC extends the hypothesize-and-verify structure of RANSAC to incorporate a number of important practical and computational considerations. In addition, we provide a general-purpose C++ software library that implements the USAC framework by leveraging state of the art algorithms for the various modules. The implementation we provide can be used by researchers either as a stand-alone tool for robust estimation, or as a benchmark for evaluating new techniques." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.257" (20681 64083 859856) new 32 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: USAC: A Universal Framework for Random Sample Consensus") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.257") (description nil "A computational problem that arises frequently in computer vision is that of estimating the parameters of a model from data that has been contaminated by noise and outliers. More generally, any practical system that seeks to estimate quantities from noisy data measurements must some means of dealing with data contamination. The Random Sample Consensus (RANSAC) algorithm is one of the most popular tools for robust estimation. Recent years have seen an explosion of activity in this area, leading to the development of a number of techniques that improve upon the efficiency and robustness of the basic algorithm. In this paper, we present a comprehensive overview of recent research in RANSAC-based robust estimation, by analyzing various approaches that have been explored over the years. We provide a common context for this analysis by introducing a new framework, which we call Universal RANSAC (USAC). USAC extends the hypothesize-and-verify structure of RANSAC to incorporate a number of important practical and computational considerations. In addition, we provide a general-purpose C++ software library that implements the USAC framework by leveraging state of the art algorithms for the various modules. The implementation we provide can be used by researchers either as a stand-alone tool for robust estimation, or as a benchmark for evaluating new techniques.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.257"))) ("PrePrint: Higher-Order Partial Least Squares (HOPLS): A Generalized Multi-Linear Regression Method" "A new generalized multilinear regression model, termed the Higher-Order Partial Least Squares (HOPLS), is introduced with the aim to predict a tensor (multiway array) &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;Y&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; from a tensor &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;X&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; through projecting the data onto the latent space and performing regression on the corresponding latent variables. HOPLS differs substantially from other regression models in that it explains the data by a sum of orthogonal Tucker tensors, while the number of orthogonal loadings serves as a parameter to control model complexity and prevent overfitting. The low dimensional latent space is optimized sequentially via a deflation operation, yielding the best joint subspace approximation for both &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;X&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; and &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;Y&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt;. Instead of decomposing &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;X&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; and &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;Y&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; individually, higher order singular value decomposition on a newly defined generalized cross-covariance tensor is employed to optimize the orthogonal loadings. A systematic comparison on both synthetic data and real-world decoding of 3D movement trajectories from electrocorticogram (ECoG) signals demonstrate the advantages of HOPLS over the existing methods in terms of better predictive ability, suitability to handle small sample sizes, and robustness to noise." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.254" (20681 64083 859856) new 33 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Higher-Order Partial Least Squares (HOPLS): A Generalized Multi-Linear Regression Method") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.254") (description nil "A new generalized multilinear regression model, termed the Higher-Order Partial Least Squares (HOPLS), is introduced with the aim to predict a tensor (multiway array) &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;Y&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; from a tensor &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;X&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; through projecting the data onto the latent space and performing regression on the corresponding latent variables. HOPLS differs substantially from other regression models in that it explains the data by a sum of orthogonal Tucker tensors, while the number of orthogonal loadings serves as a parameter to control model complexity and prevent overfitting. The low dimensional latent space is optimized sequentially via a deflation operation, yielding the best joint subspace approximation for both &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;X&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; and &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;Y&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt;. Instead of decomposing &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;X&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; and &lt;b&gt;&lt;u&gt;Y&lt;/u&gt;&lt;/b&gt; individually, higher order singular value decomposition on a newly defined generalized cross-covariance tensor is employed to optimize the orthogonal loadings. A systematic comparison on both synthetic data and real-world decoding of 3D movement trajectories from electrocorticogram (ECoG) signals demonstrate the advantages of HOPLS over the existing methods in terms of better predictive ability, suitability to handle small sample sizes, and robustness to noise.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.254"))) ("PrePrint: Parsing Facades with Shape Grammars and Reinforcement Learning" "In this work we use Shape Grammars for Facade Parsing, which amounts to segmenting 2D building facades into balconies, walls, windows and doors in an architecturally meaningful manner. The main thrust of our work is the introduction of Reinforcement Learning (RL) techniques to deal with the computational complexity of the problem. RL provides us with efficient tools such as Q-learning and state aggregation which we exploit to accelerate facade parsing. We initially phrase the 1D parsing problem in terms of Markov Decision Processes, paving the way for the application of RL-based tools. We then develop novel techniques for the 2D shape parsing problem that take into account the specificities of the facade parsing problem. Specifically, we use state aggregation to enforce the symmetry of facade floors and also demonstrate that RL can seamlessly exploit bottom-up, image-based guidance during optimization. We provide systematic results on the Paris building dataset and obtain state-of-the-art results in a fraction of the time required by previous methods. We validate our method under diverse imaging conditions and make our software and results available online." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.252" (20681 64083 859856) new 34 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Parsing Facades with Shape Grammars and Reinforcement Learning") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.252") (description nil "In this work we use Shape Grammars for Facade Parsing, which amounts to segmenting 2D building facades into balconies, walls, windows and doors in an architecturally meaningful manner. The main thrust of our work is the introduction of Reinforcement Learning (RL) techniques to deal with the computational complexity of the problem. RL provides us with efficient tools such as Q-learning and state aggregation which we exploit to accelerate facade parsing. We initially phrase the 1D parsing problem in terms of Markov Decision Processes, paving the way for the application of RL-based tools. We then develop novel techniques for the 2D shape parsing problem that take into account the specificities of the facade parsing problem. Specifically, we use state aggregation to enforce the symmetry of facade floors and also demonstrate that RL can seamlessly exploit bottom-up, image-based guidance during optimization. We provide systematic results on the Paris building dataset and obtain state-of-the-art results in a fraction of the time required by previous methods. We validate our method under diverse imaging conditions and make our software and results available online.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.252"))) ("PrePrint: Color Invariants for Person Re-Identification" "We revisit the problem of specific object recognition using color distributions. In some applications - such as specific person identification - it is highly likely that the color distributions will be multimodal and hence contain a special structure. Although the color distribution changes under different lighting conditions, some aspects of its structure turn out to be invariants. We refer to this structure as an intra-distribution structure, and show that it is invariant under a wide range of imaging conditions while being discriminative enough to be practical. Our signature uses shape context descriptors to represent the intra-distribution structure. Assuming the widely used diagonal model, we validate that our signature is invariant under certain illumination changes. Experimentally, we use color information as the only cue to obtain good recognition performance on publicly available databases covering both indoors and outdoors conditions. Combining our approach with the complementary covariance descriptor, we demonstrate results exceeding the state of the art performance on the challenging VIPeR and CAVIAR4REID databases." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.246" (20681 64083 859856) new 35 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Color Invariants for Person Re-Identification") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.246") (description nil "We revisit the problem of specific object recognition using color distributions. In some applications - such as specific person identification - it is highly likely that the color distributions will be multimodal and hence contain a special structure. Although the color distribution changes under different lighting conditions, some aspects of its structure turn out to be invariants. We refer to this structure as an intra-distribution structure, and show that it is invariant under a wide range of imaging conditions while being discriminative enough to be practical. Our signature uses shape context descriptors to represent the intra-distribution structure. Assuming the widely used diagonal model, we validate that our signature is invariant under certain illumination changes. Experimentally, we use color information as the only cue to obtain good recognition performance on publicly available databases covering both indoors and outdoors conditions. Combining our approach with the complementary covariance descriptor, we demonstrate results exceeding the state of the art performance on the challenging VIPeR and CAVIAR4REID databases.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.246"))) ("PrePrint: Bayesian Estimation of Turbulent Motion" "Based on physical laws describing the multi-scale structure of turbulent flows, this article proposes a regularizer for fluid motion estimation from an image sequence. Regularization is achieved by imposing some scale invariance property between histograms of motion increments computed at different scales. By reformulating this problem from a Bayesian perspective, an algorithm is proposed to jointly estimate motion, regularization hyper-parameters, and to select the most likely physical prior among a set of models. Hyper-parameter and model inference is conducted by posterior maximization, obtained by marginalizing out non-Gaussian motion variables. The Bayesian estimator is assessed on several image sequences depicting synthetic and real turbulent fluid flows. Results obtained with the proposed approach exceed the state of the art results in fluid flow estimation." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.232" (20681 64083 859856) new 36 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Bayesian Estimation of Turbulent Motion") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.232") (description nil "Based on physical laws describing the multi-scale structure of turbulent flows, this article proposes a regularizer for fluid motion estimation from an image sequence. Regularization is achieved by imposing some scale invariance property between histograms of motion increments computed at different scales. By reformulating this problem from a Bayesian perspective, an algorithm is proposed to jointly estimate motion, regularization hyper-parameters, and to select the most likely physical prior among a set of models. Hyper-parameter and model inference is conducted by posterior maximization, obtained by marginalizing out non-Gaussian motion variables. The Bayesian estimator is assessed on several image sequences depicting synthetic and real turbulent fluid flows. Results obtained with the proposed approach exceed the state of the art results in fluid flow estimation.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.232"))) ("IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence - Jan. 2013 (Vol. 35, No. 1)" "IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence" "http://opac.ieeecomputersociety.org/opac?year=2013&volume=35&issue=01&acronym=tpami" (20681 64083 859856) new 37 nil nil ((title nil "IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence - Jan. 2013 (Vol. 35, No. 1)") (link nil "http://opac.ieeecomputersociety.org/opac?year=2013&volume=35&issue=01&acronym=tpami") (description nil "IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://www.computer.org/portal/site/tpami/"))) ("PrePrint: A Framework for Binding and Retrieving Class-Specific Information to and from Image Patterns using Correlation Filters" "We describe a template-based framework to bind class-specific information to a set of image patterns and retrieve that information by matching the template to a query pattern of the same class. This is done by mapping the class-specific information to a set of spatial translations which are applied to the set of image patterns from which a template is designed taking advantage of the properties of correlation filters. The bound information is retrieved during matching with an authentic query by estimating the spatial translations applied to the images that were used to design the template. In this paper we focus on the problem of binding information to biometric signatures as an application of our framework. Our framework is flexible enough to allow spreading the information to be bound over multiple pattern classes which in the context of biometric key-binding enables multi-class and multi-modal biometric key-binding. We demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed scheme via extensive numerical results on multiple biometric databases." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.244" (20681 64083 859856) new 38 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: A Framework for Binding and Retrieving Class-Specific Information to and from Image Patterns using Correlation Filters") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.244") (description nil "We describe a template-based framework to bind class-specific information to a set of image patterns and retrieve that information by matching the template to a query pattern of the same class. This is done by mapping the class-specific information to a set of spatial translations which are applied to the set of image patterns from which a template is designed taking advantage of the properties of correlation filters. The bound information is retrieved during matching with an authentic query by estimating the spatial translations applied to the images that were used to design the template. In this paper we focus on the problem of binding information to biometric signatures as an application of our framework. Our framework is flexible enough to allow spreading the information to be bound over multiple pattern classes which in the context of biometric key-binding enables multi-class and multi-modal biometric key-binding. We demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed scheme via extensive numerical results on multiple biometric databases.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.244"))) ("PrePrint: Automatic Relevance Determination in Nonnegative Matrix Factorization with the {beta}-Divergence" "This paper addresses the estimation of the latent dimensionality in nonnegative matrix factorization (NMF) with the $\\beta$-divergence. The $\\beta$-divergence is a family of cost functions that includes the squared Euclidean distance, Kullback-Leibler and Itakura-Saito divergences as special cases. Learning the model order is important as it is necessary to strike the right balance between data fidelity and overfitting. We propose a Bayesian model based on {\\em automatic relevance determination} in which the columns of the dictionary matrix and the rows of the activation matrix are tied together through a common scale parameter in their prior. A family of majorization-minimization algorithms is proposed for maximum a posteriori (MAP) estimation. A subset of scale parameters is driven to a small lower bound in the course of inference, with the effect of pruning the corresponding spurious components. We demonstrate the efficacy and robustness of our algorithms by performing extensive experiments on synthetic data, the \"swimmer\" dataset, a music decomposition example and a stock price prediction task." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.240" (20681 64083 859856) new 39 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Automatic Relevance Determination in Nonnegative Matrix Factorization with the {beta}-Divergence") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.240") (description nil "This paper addresses the estimation of the latent dimensionality in nonnegative matrix factorization (NMF) with the $\\beta$-divergence. The $\\beta$-divergence is a family of cost functions that includes the squared Euclidean distance, Kullback-Leibler and Itakura-Saito divergences as special cases. Learning the model order is important as it is necessary to strike the right balance between data fidelity and overfitting. We propose a Bayesian model based on {\\em automatic relevance determination} in which the columns of the dictionary matrix and the rows of the activation matrix are tied together through a common scale parameter in their prior. A family of majorization-minimization algorithms is proposed for maximum a posteriori (MAP) estimation. A subset of scale parameters is driven to a small lower bound in the course of inference, with the effect of pruning the corresponding spurious components. We demonstrate the efficacy and robustness of our algorithms by performing extensive experiments on synthetic data, the \"swimmer\" dataset, a music decomposition example and a stock price prediction task.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.240"))) ("PrePrint: Coupled Gaussian Processes for Pose-Invariant Facial Expression Recognition" "We propose a method for head-pose invariant facial expression recognition that is based on a set of characteristic facial points. To achieve head-pose invariance, we propose the Coupled Scaled Gaussian Process Regression (CSGPR) model for head-pose normalization. In this model, we first learn independently the mappings between the facial points in each pair of (discrete) non-frontal poses and the frontal pose, and then perform their coupling in order to capture dependencies between them. During inference, the outputs of the coupled functions from different poses are combined using a gating function, devised based on the head-pose estimation for the query points. The proposed model outperforms state-of-the-art regression-based approaches to head-pose normalization, 2D and 3D Point Distribution Models (PDMs), and Active Appearance Models (AAMs), especially in cases of unknown poses and imbalanced training data. To the best of our knowledge, the proposed method is the first one that is able to deal with expressive faces in the range from $-45^\\circ$ to $+45^\\circ$ pan rotation and $-30^\\circ$ to $+30^\\circ$ tilt rotation, and with continuous changes in head pose, despite the fact that training was conducted on a small set of discrete poses. We evaluate the proposed method on synthetic and real images depicting acted and spontaneously displayed facial expressions." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.233" (20681 64083 859856) new 40 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Coupled Gaussian Processes for Pose-Invariant Facial Expression Recognition") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.233") (description nil "We propose a method for head-pose invariant facial expression recognition that is based on a set of characteristic facial points. To achieve head-pose invariance, we propose the Coupled Scaled Gaussian Process Regression (CSGPR) model for head-pose normalization. In this model, we first learn independently the mappings between the facial points in each pair of (discrete) non-frontal poses and the frontal pose, and then perform their coupling in order to capture dependencies between them. During inference, the outputs of the coupled functions from different poses are combined using a gating function, devised based on the head-pose estimation for the query points. The proposed model outperforms state-of-the-art regression-based approaches to head-pose normalization, 2D and 3D Point Distribution Models (PDMs), and Active Appearance Models (AAMs), especially in cases of unknown poses and imbalanced training data. To the best of our knowledge, the proposed method is the first one that is able to deal with expressive faces in the range from $-45^\\circ$ to $+45^\\circ$ pan rotation and $-30^\\circ$ to $+30^\\circ$ tilt rotation, and with continuous changes in head pose, despite the fact that training was conducted on a small set of discrete poses. We evaluate the proposed method on synthetic and real images depicting acted and spontaneously displayed facial expressions.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.233"))) ("PrePrint: Learning Hierarchical Features for Scene Labeling" "Scene labeling consists in labeling each pixel in an image with the category of the object it belongs to. We propose a method that uses a multiscale convolutional network trained from raw pixels to extract dense feature vectors that encode regions of multiple sizes centered on each pixel. The method alleviates the need for engineered features, and produces a powerful representation that captures texture, shape and contextual information. We report results using multiple post-processing methods to produce the final labeling. Among those, we propose a technique to automatically retrieve, from a pool of segmentation components, an optimal set of components that best explain the scene; these components are arbitrary, e.g. they can be taken from a segmentation tree, or from any family of over-segmentations. The system yields record accuracies on the Sift Flow Dataset (33 classes) and the Barcelona Dataset (170 classes) and near-record accuracy on Stanford Background Dataset (8 classes), while being an order of magnitude faster than competing approaches, producing a 320x240 image labeling in less than a second, including feature extraction." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.231" (20681 64083 859856) new 41 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Learning Hierarchical Features for Scene Labeling") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.231") (description nil "Scene labeling consists in labeling each pixel in an image with the category of the object it belongs to. We propose a method that uses a multiscale convolutional network trained from raw pixels to extract dense feature vectors that encode regions of multiple sizes centered on each pixel. The method alleviates the need for engineered features, and produces a powerful representation that captures texture, shape and contextual information. We report results using multiple post-processing methods to produce the final labeling. Among those, we propose a technique to automatically retrieve, from a pool of segmentation components, an optimal set of components that best explain the scene; these components are arbitrary, e.g. they can be taken from a segmentation tree, or from any family of over-segmentations. The system yields record accuracies on the Sift Flow Dataset (33 classes) and the Barcelona Dataset (170 classes) and near-record accuracy on Stanford Background Dataset (8 classes), while being an order of magnitude faster than competing approaches, producing a 320x240 image labeling in less than a second, including feature extraction.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.231"))) ("PrePrint: Invariant Scattering Convolution Networks" "A wavelet scattering network computes a translation invariant image representation, which is stable to deformations and preserves high frequency information for classification. It cascades wavelet transform convolutions with non-linear modulus and averaging operators. The first network layer outputs SIFT-type descriptors whereas the next layers provide complementary invariant information which improves classification. The mathematical analysis of wavelet scattering networks explain important properties of deep convolution networks for classification. A scattering representation of stationary processes incorporates higher order moments and can thus discriminate textures having same Fourier power spectrum. State of the art classification results are obtained for handwritten digits and texture discrimination, with a Gaussian kernel SVM and a generative PCA classifier." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.230" (20681 64083 859856) new 42 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Invariant Scattering Convolution Networks") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.230") (description nil "A wavelet scattering network computes a translation invariant image representation, which is stable to deformations and preserves high frequency information for classification. It cascades wavelet transform convolutions with non-linear modulus and averaging operators. The first network layer outputs SIFT-type descriptors whereas the next layers provide complementary invariant information which improves classification. The mathematical analysis of wavelet scattering networks explain important properties of deep convolution networks for classification. A scattering representation of stationary processes incorporates higher order moments and can thus discriminate textures having same Fourier power spectrum. State of the art classification results are obtained for handwritten digits and texture discrimination, with a Gaussian kernel SVM and a generative PCA classifier.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.230"))) ("PrePrint: Heterogeneous Face Recognition using Kernel Prototype Similarities" "Heterogeneous face recognition (HFR) involves matching two face images from alternate imaging modalities, such as an infrared image to a photograph, or a sketch to a photograph. Accurate HFR systems are of great value in various applications (e.g., forensics and surveillance), where the gallery databases are populated with photographs (e.g. mug shot or passport photographs) but the probe images are often limited to some alternate modality. A generic HFR framework is proposed in which both probe and gallery images are represented in terms of non-linear similarities to a collection of prototype face images. The prototype subjects (i.e., the training set) have an image in each modality (probe and gallery), and the similarity of an image is measured against the prototype images from the corresponding modality. The accuracy of this non-linear prototype representation is is improved by projecting the features into a linear discriminant subspace. Random sampling is introduced into the HFR framework to better handle challeges arising from the small sample size problem. The merits of the proposed approach, called Prototype Random Subspace (P-RS), is demostrated on four different heterogeneous scenarios: (i) near infrared to photograph, (ii) thermal to photograph, (iii) viewed sketch to photograph, and (iv) forensic sketch to photograph." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.229" (20681 64083 859856) new 43 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Heterogeneous Face Recognition using Kernel Prototype Similarities") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.229") (description nil "Heterogeneous face recognition (HFR) involves matching two face images from alternate imaging modalities, such as an infrared image to a photograph, or a sketch to a photograph. Accurate HFR systems are of great value in various applications (e.g., forensics and surveillance), where the gallery databases are populated with photographs (e.g. mug shot or passport photographs) but the probe images are often limited to some alternate modality. A generic HFR framework is proposed in which both probe and gallery images are represented in terms of non-linear similarities to a collection of prototype face images. The prototype subjects (i.e., the training set) have an image in each modality (probe and gallery), and the similarity of an image is measured against the prototype images from the corresponding modality. The accuracy of this non-linear prototype representation is is improved by projecting the features into a linear discriminant subspace. Random sampling is introduced into the HFR framework to better handle challeges arising from the small sample size problem. The merits of the proposed approach, called Prototype Random Subspace (P-RS), is demostrated on four different heterogeneous scenarios: (i) near infrared to photograph, (ii) thermal to photograph, (iii) viewed sketch to photograph, and (iv) forensic sketch to photograph.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.229"))) ("PrePrint: Fourier Lucas-Kanade Algorithm" "In this paper we propose a framework for both gradient descent image and object alignment in the Fourier domain. Our method centers upon the classical Lucas &amp; Kanade (LK) algorithm where we represent the source and template/model in the complex 2D Fourier domain rather than in the spatial 2D domain. We refer to our approach as the Fourier LK (FLK) algorithm. The FLK formulation is advantageous when one pre-processes the source image and template/model with a bank of filters (e.g. oriented edges, Gabor, etc.) as: (i) it can handle substantial illumination variations, (ii) the inefficient pre-processing filter bank step can be subsumed within the FLK algorithm as a sparse diagonal weighting matrix, (iii) unlike traditional LK the computational cost is invariant to the number of filters and as a result far more efficient, and (iv) this approach can be extended to the inverse compositional form of the LK algorithm where nearly all steps (including Fourier transform and filter bank pre-processing) can be pre-computed leading to an extremely efficient and robust approach to gradient descent image matching. Further, these computational savings translate to non-rigid object alignment tasks that are considered extensions of the LK algorithm such as those found in Active Appearance Models (AAMs)." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.220" (20681 64083 859856) new 44 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Fourier Lucas-Kanade Algorithm") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.220") (description nil "In this paper we propose a framework for both gradient descent image and object alignment in the Fourier domain. Our method centers upon the classical Lucas &amp; Kanade (LK) algorithm where we represent the source and template/model in the complex 2D Fourier domain rather than in the spatial 2D domain. We refer to our approach as the Fourier LK (FLK) algorithm. The FLK formulation is advantageous when one pre-processes the source image and template/model with a bank of filters (e.g. oriented edges, Gabor, etc.) as: (i) it can handle substantial illumination variations, (ii) the inefficient pre-processing filter bank step can be subsumed within the FLK algorithm as a sparse diagonal weighting matrix, (iii) unlike traditional LK the computational cost is invariant to the number of filters and as a result far more efficient, and (iv) this approach can be extended to the inverse compositional form of the LK algorithm where nearly all steps (including Fourier transform and filter bank pre-processing) can be pre-computed leading to an extremely efficient and robust approach to gradient descent image matching. Further, these computational savings translate to non-rigid object alignment tasks that are considered extensions of the LK algorithm such as those found in Active Appearance Models (AAMs).") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.220"))) ("PrePrint: Guided Image Filtering" "In this paper we propose a novel explicit image filter called guided filter. Derived from a local linear model, the guided filter computes the filtering output by considering the content of a guidance image, which can be the input image itself or another different image. The guided filter can be used as an edge-preserving smoothing operator like the popular bilateral filter, but has better behaviors near edges. The guided filter is also a more generic concept beyond smoothing: it can transfer the structures of the guidance image to the filtering output, enabling new filtering applications like dehazing and guided feathering. Moreover, the guided filter naturally has a fast and non-approximate linear time algorithm, regardless of the kernel size and the intensity range. Currently it is one of the fastest edge-preserving filters. Experiments show that the guided filter is both effective and efficient in a great variety of computer vision and computer graphics applications including edge-aware smoothing, detail enhancement, HDR compression, image matting/feathering, dehazing, joint upsampling, etc." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.213" (20681 64083 859856) new 45 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Guided Image Filtering") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.213") (description nil "In this paper we propose a novel explicit image filter called guided filter. Derived from a local linear model, the guided filter computes the filtering output by considering the content of a guidance image, which can be the input image itself or another different image. The guided filter can be used as an edge-preserving smoothing operator like the popular bilateral filter, but has better behaviors near edges. The guided filter is also a more generic concept beyond smoothing: it can transfer the structures of the guidance image to the filtering output, enabling new filtering applications like dehazing and guided feathering. Moreover, the guided filter naturally has a fast and non-approximate linear time algorithm, regardless of the kernel size and the intensity range. Currently it is one of the fastest edge-preserving filters. Experiments show that the guided filter is both effective and efficient in a great variety of computer vision and computer graphics applications including edge-aware smoothing, detail enhancement, HDR compression, image matting/feathering, dehazing, joint upsampling, etc.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.213"))) ("PrePrint: Inverse Rendering of Faces with a 3D Morphable Model" "In this paper, we present a complete framework to inverse render faces with a 3D Morphable Model (3DMM). By decomposing the image formation process into a geometric and photometric part, we are able to state the problem as a multilinear system which can be solved accurately and efficiently. As we treat each contribution as independent, the objective function is convex in the parameters and a global solution is guaranteed. We start by recovering 3D shape using a novel algorithm which incorporates generalisation error of the model obtained from empirical measurements. We then describe two methods to recover facial texture, diffuse lighting, specular reflectance and camera properties from a single image. The methods make increasingly weak assumptions and can be solved in a linear fashion. We evaluate our findings on a publicly available database, where we are able to outperform an existing state-of-the-art algorithm. We demonstrate the usability of the recovered parameters in a recognition experiment conducted on the CMU-PIE database." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.206" (20681 64083 859856) new 46 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Inverse Rendering of Faces with a 3D Morphable Model") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.206") (description nil "In this paper, we present a complete framework to inverse render faces with a 3D Morphable Model (3DMM). By decomposing the image formation process into a geometric and photometric part, we are able to state the problem as a multilinear system which can be solved accurately and efficiently. As we treat each contribution as independent, the objective function is convex in the parameters and a global solution is guaranteed. We start by recovering 3D shape using a novel algorithm which incorporates generalisation error of the model obtained from empirical measurements. We then describe two methods to recover facial texture, diffuse lighting, specular reflectance and camera properties from a single image. The methods make increasingly weak assumptions and can be solved in a linear fashion. We evaluate our findings on a publicly available database, where we are able to outperform an existing state-of-the-art algorithm. We demonstrate the usability of the recovered parameters in a recognition experiment conducted on the CMU-PIE database.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.206"))) ("PrePrint: Linear Dependency Modeling for Classifier Fusion and Feature Combination" "This paper addresses the independent assumption issue in fusion process. In the last decade, dependency modeling techniques were developed under a specific distribution of classifiers or by estimating the joint distribution of the posterior. This paper proposes a new framework to model the dependency between features without any assumption on feature/classifier distribution, and overcome the difficulty in estimating the high-dimensional joint distribution. In this paper, we prove that feature dependency can be modeled by a linear combination of the posterior probabilities under some mild assumptions. Based on the linear combination property, two methods, namely Linear Classifier Dependency Modeling (LCDM) and Linear Feature Dependency Modeling (LFDM), are derived and developed for dependency modeling in classifier level and feature level, respectively. The optimal models for LCDM and LFDM are learned by maximizing the margin between the genuine and imposter posterior probabilities. Both synthetic data and real datasets are used for experiments. Experimental results show that LCDM and LFDM with dependency modeling outperform existing classifier level and feature level combination methods under non-normal distributions and on four real databases, respectively. Comparing the classifier level and feature level fusion methods, LFDM gives the best performance." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.198" (20681 64083 859856) new 47 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Linear Dependency Modeling for Classifier Fusion and Feature Combination") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.198") (description nil "This paper addresses the independent assumption issue in fusion process. In the last decade, dependency modeling techniques were developed under a specific distribution of classifiers or by estimating the joint distribution of the posterior. This paper proposes a new framework to model the dependency between features without any assumption on feature/classifier distribution, and overcome the difficulty in estimating the high-dimensional joint distribution. In this paper, we prove that feature dependency can be modeled by a linear combination of the posterior probabilities under some mild assumptions. Based on the linear combination property, two methods, namely Linear Classifier Dependency Modeling (LCDM) and Linear Feature Dependency Modeling (LFDM), are derived and developed for dependency modeling in classifier level and feature level, respectively. The optimal models for LCDM and LFDM are learned by maximizing the margin between the genuine and imposter posterior probabilities. Both synthetic data and real datasets are used for experiments. Experimental results show that LCDM and LFDM with dependency modeling outperform existing classifier level and feature level combination methods under non-normal distributions and on four real databases, respectively. Comparing the classifier level and feature level fusion methods, LFDM gives the best performance.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.198"))) ("PrePrint: Multiscale Local Phase Quantisation for Robust Component-based Face Recognition using Kernel Fusion of Multiple Descriptors" "Face recognition subject to uncontrolled illumination and blur is challenging. Interestingly, image degradation caused by blurring has mostly been overlooked by the face recognition community. We propose a number of counter-measures designed to achieve system robustness to blurring. First, we propose a novel blur-robust face image descriptor based on Local Phase Quantisation (LPQ) and extend it to a multiscale framework (MLPQ) to increase its effectiveness. To maximise the insensitivity to misalignment, the MLPQ descriptor is computed regionally, by adopting a component-based framework. Second, the regional features are combined using kernel fusion. Third, the proposed MLPQ representation is combined with the Multiscale Local Binary Pattern (MLBP) descriptor using kernel fusion to increase insensitivity to illumination. Kernel Discriminant Analysis (KDA) of the combined features extracts discriminative information for face recognition. Last, two geometric normalisations are used to generate and combine multiple scores from different face image scales to enhance the accuracy further. The proposed approach has been comprehensively evaluated using several well-known databases. The combined system is comparable to the state of the art approaches using similar system configurations. The reported work provides a new insight into the merits of various face representation and fusion methods, as well as their role in dealing with variable lighting and blur degradation." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.199" (20681 64083 859856) new 48 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Multiscale Local Phase Quantisation for Robust Component-based Face Recognition using Kernel Fusion of Multiple Descriptors") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.199") (description nil "Face recognition subject to uncontrolled illumination and blur is challenging. Interestingly, image degradation caused by blurring has mostly been overlooked by the face recognition community. We propose a number of counter-measures designed to achieve system robustness to blurring. First, we propose a novel blur-robust face image descriptor based on Local Phase Quantisation (LPQ) and extend it to a multiscale framework (MLPQ) to increase its effectiveness. To maximise the insensitivity to misalignment, the MLPQ descriptor is computed regionally, by adopting a component-based framework. Second, the regional features are combined using kernel fusion. Third, the proposed MLPQ representation is combined with the Multiscale Local Binary Pattern (MLBP) descriptor using kernel fusion to increase insensitivity to illumination. Kernel Discriminant Analysis (KDA) of the combined features extracts discriminative information for face recognition. Last, two geometric normalisations are used to generate and combine multiple scores from different face image scales to enhance the accuracy further. The proposed approach has been comprehensively evaluated using several well-known databases. The combined system is comparable to the state of the art approaches using similar system configurations. The reported work provides a new insight into the merits of various face representation and fusion methods, as well as their role in dealing with variable lighting and blur degradation.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.199"))) ("PrePrint: Tracking People's Hands and Feet using Mixed Network AND/OR Search" "We describe a framework that leverages mixed probabilistic and deterministic networks and their AND/OR search space to efficiently find and track the hands and feet of multiple interacting humans in 2D from a single camera view. Our framework detects and tracks multiple people's heads, hands, and feet through partial or full occlusion; requires few constraints (does not require multiple views, high image resolution, knowledge of performed activities, or large training sets); and makes use of constraints and AND/OR Branch-and-Bound with lazy evaluation and carefully computed bounds to efficiently solve the complex network that results from the consideration of inter-person occlusion. Our main contributions are 1) a multi-person part-based formulation that emphasizes extremities and allows for the globally optimal solution to be obtained in each frame, and 2) an efficient and exact optimization scheme that relies on AND/OR Branch-and-Bound, lazy factor evaluation, and factor cost sensitive bottom-up bound computation. We demonstrate our approach on three datasets: the public single person HumanEva dataset, outdoor sequences where multiple people interact in a group meeting scenario, and outdoor one-on-one basketball videos. The first dataset demonstrates that our framework achieves state-of-the-art performance in the single person setting, while the last two demonstrate robustness in the presence of partial and full occlusion and fast non-trivial motion." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.187" (20681 64083 859856) new 49 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Tracking People's Hands and Feet using Mixed Network AND/OR Search") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.187") (description nil "We describe a framework that leverages mixed probabilistic and deterministic networks and their AND/OR search space to efficiently find and track the hands and feet of multiple interacting humans in 2D from a single camera view. Our framework detects and tracks multiple people's heads, hands, and feet through partial or full occlusion; requires few constraints (does not require multiple views, high image resolution, knowledge of performed activities, or large training sets); and makes use of constraints and AND/OR Branch-and-Bound with lazy evaluation and carefully computed bounds to efficiently solve the complex network that results from the consideration of inter-person occlusion. Our main contributions are 1) a multi-person part-based formulation that emphasizes extremities and allows for the globally optimal solution to be obtained in each frame, and 2) an efficient and exact optimization scheme that relies on AND/OR Branch-and-Bound, lazy factor evaluation, and factor cost sensitive bottom-up bound computation. We demonstrate our approach on three datasets: the public single person HumanEva dataset, outdoor sequences where multiple people interact in a group meeting scenario, and outdoor one-on-one basketball videos. The first dataset demonstrates that our framework achieves state-of-the-art performance in the single person setting, while the last two demonstrate robustness in the presence of partial and full occlusion and fast non-trivial motion.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.187"))) ("PrePrint: Self-Calibration of Catadioptric Camera with Two Planar Mirrors from Silhouettes" "If an object is inter-reflected between two planar mirrors, we may take an image containing both the object and its multiple reflections, i.e., simultaneously imaging multiple views of an object by a single pinhole camera. This paper emphasizes the problem of recovering both the intrinsic and extrinsic parameters of the camera using multiple silhouettes from one single image. View pairs among views in a single image can be divided into two kinds by the relationship between the two views in the pair: reflected by some mirror (real or virtual), and in circular motion. Epipoles in the first kind of pairs can be easily determined from intersections of common tangent lines of silhouettes. Based on projective properties of these epipoles, efficient methods are proposed to recover both the imaged circular points and the included angle between two mirrors. Epipoles in the second kind of pairs can be recovered simultaneously with the projection of intersection line between two mirrors, by solving a simple one dimensional optimization problem using the consistency constraint of epipolar tangent lines. Fundamental matrices among views in a single image are all recovered. Using the estimated intrinsic and extrinsic parameters of the camera, a euclidean reconstruction can be obtained. Experiments validate the proposed approach." "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.195" (20681 64083 859856) new 50 nil nil ((title nil "PrePrint: Self-Calibration of Catadioptric Camera with Two Planar Mirrors from Silhouettes") (link nil "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.195") (description nil "If an object is inter-reflected between two planar mirrors, we may take an image containing both the object and its multiple reflections, i.e., simultaneously imaging multiple views of an object by a single pinhole camera. This paper emphasizes the problem of recovering both the intrinsic and extrinsic parameters of the camera using multiple silhouettes from one single image. View pairs among views in a single image can be divided into two kinds by the relationship between the two views in the pair: reflected by some mirror (real or virtual), and in circular motion. Epipoles in the first kind of pairs can be easily determined from intersections of common tangent lines of silhouettes. Based on projective properties of these epipoles, efficient methods are proposed to recover both the imaged circular points and the included angle between two mirrors. Epipoles in the second kind of pairs can be recovered simultaneously with the projection of intersection line between two mirrors, by solving a simple one dimensional optimization problem using the consistency constraint of epipolar tangent lines. Fundamental matrices among views in a single image are all recovered. Using the estimated intrinsic and extrinsic parameters of the camera, a euclidean reconstruction can be obtained. Experiments validate the proposed approach.") (guid ((isPermaLink . "true")) "http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/TPAMI.2012.195"))))